Bulgaria's general election matters for Europeans. Here's whyThe EU's poorest country heads to the polls on Sunday, April 4.
COVID-19 means closing global gender gap 'will take an extra 36 years'It found that the pandemic has had a more negative impact on women than men. Not only have women lost their jobs at higher rates, but they are also being hired at a slower pace.
Poland moves a step closer to quitting domestic violence treatyThe Polish government claims the Istanbul Convention does not respect religion and promotes controversial ideologies about gender.
EU must step up and get sea protection treaty over the line | View"EU leaders must raise their ambitions far beyond the safeguarding language currently on the table that risks creating yet another talking shop," says Sweden's former deputy PM Isabella Lövin
Is COVID jab diplomacy about values over vaccines in Europe's east?
EU-China: Sanctions, threats and boycotts see relations declineRelations between the bloc and Beijing have taken a sudden turn for the worse after Brussels coordinated sanctions with its Western allies.
G. Gordon Liddy, Watergate mastermind, dead at 90Liddy, a former FBI agent and Army veteran, was convicted of conspiracy, burglary and illegal wiretapping for his role in the Watergate burglary.
Brazil military chiefs quit as Bolsonaro seeks their supportThe leaders of all three branches of Brazil’s armed forces jointly resigned following President Jair Bolsonaro's replacement of the defence minister
EU, U.S. and other nations pledge €5.5 billion to Syria reconstruction
Polish journalist released from Myanmar detention
Austria in talks to purchase Sputnik V vaccine from Russia
Montenegro justice minister denies Srebrenica genocide rejection
Did Scandinavia overreact in suspending AstraZeneca vaccinations?
The German Constitutional Court has blocked the EU's recovery fund. What happens now?In a surprising decision, the court prevented the German President from signing off the ratification of the legal text that would enable the Commission to raise funds on the capital markets.
China reduces elected seats in Hong Kong legislature
Witnesses say they saw George Floyd 'slowly fade away'
Activity is the ‘miracle pill’ that could save both people and planetWe spoke with Peter Walker about his new book The Miracle Pill & how increasing activity could help the environment too.
President Biden warns Americans of fourth wave of COVID-19
Brussels conference on Syria aims to raise billions for crisisMore than 50 countries are attending the virtual conference taking place Monday and Tuesday, where the international community is being asked for over €8bn to fund humanitarian causes.
Belarus charges Sviatlana Tsikhanouskaya with terrorism
Alexei Navalny claims he is being harassed by Russian prison staff
Protests in Beirut amid political stalemate and economic crisisThe protest, organised by Lebanon's Communist Party, blocked traffic in central Beirut.
WHO report concludes lab leak is 'unlikely' origin of COVID-19: AP
Thousands flee into Thailand following Myanmar air strikesThai authorities along the country's northwestern border braced themselves Monday for a possible influx of more ethnic Karen villagers fleeing new airstrikes from the Myanmar military.
Slovakia’s prime minister steps down amid Sputnik V vaccine scandal
Thousands of Germans fly to Mallorca amid rising infection cases
Armenian Prime Minister confirms he will step down to allow electionNikol Pashinyan has faced weeks of protests calling for his resignation in the wake of Armenia’s defeat in last year’s war with Azerbaijan.
Suicide bomb targets Mass in Indonesia, 20 woundedThe attack took place at the Sacred Heart of Jesus Cathedral in Makassar, the capital of South Sulawesi province.
Global condemnation after Myanmar's deadliest day since coupThe EU, US and UK are "horrified" by the "bloodshed" in Myanmar after more than 100 people were killed on Saturday during anti-coup protests.
President Joe Biden invites Putin and Xi to climate talks
France 'was not complicit' in Rwandan genocide, report claims
Kosovo's EU-backed war crimes court 'has full US backing'
Milk March: The unspoken symbolism of one UK MP's milk protestChristopher Sebastian gives us his take on the symbolism of British MP Sir Charles Walker's milk protest.
German election: Six months ahead of the vote, where do things stand?Two key things make this election remarkable: Chancellor Angela Merkel is bowing out after 16 years in office and, perhaps even more significantly, the fact that no one can really predict what is going to happen now after years of certainty.
A decade after talks began, is Romania any closer to joining Schengen?
EU medicines regulator approves new COVID-19 vaccine production sites
Europe's week: Leaders meet virtually, as EU and US renew their vowsEU heads of state and government held a videoconference Thursday as a third wave of the coronavirus hits the continent.
NATO, China, Russia, Nord Stream 2, US Secretary of State gives the lowdownUS Secretary of State, Antony Blinken, recently visited NATO headquarters in Brussels to renew America's ties with the alliance. He tells us about his reasons for visiting Europe and what relations will look like under the Biden administration.
Chinese social media campaign leads to boycott of major fashion brandsH&M, Nike and Uniqlo are being protested over statements about the cotton industry and Uyghur forced labour.
Alex Salmond launches new pro-independence party in ScotlandScotland: Former first minister Alex Salmond will run as leader of pro-independence 'Alba' party in May elections
Muhammad cartoons: UK education secretary condemns threats to teacher
Belarus: Over 200 arrested during Freedom Day protestsThe EU's top diplomat warned on Thursday that "we are witnessing a further escalation of repression against the Belarusian people".
China slaps sanctions on UK lawmakers and entities amid Xinjiang rowThey join the 10 Europeans and four entities slapped with Chinese sanctions earlier this week.
Albania's election season begins amid violence, recriminations
President Joe Biden, 78, plans to run for a second term in 2024Biden told reporters that he expected to run for the White House in the next election.
In Israel, still no winner after fourth election in two years
Has a football scandal exposed endemic racism in the Czech Republic?Allegations of racism in the Rangers-Slavia Prague game has put the spotlight on attitudes to minorities in the Czech Republic.
The pandemic can change the domestic power balance | View
What is the happiest country in the world in 2021?
European journalists demand release of jailed Belarusian colleaguesMore than 50 European journalists' unions on Thursday urged their governments to up the pressure on Belarus to release jailed journalists as the country marks Freedom Day.
Migrants stuck in Spain's Canary Islands say camps are unfitMore than 23,000 people from Morocco and West Africa arrived on the resort archipelago in the past year as authorities cracked down on previously popular routes on the Mediterranean.
Alexei Navalny health 'deteriorating' in jail, lawyers say
China attacks H&M and other Western clothing brands over XinjiangBeijing often attacks foreign clothing, auto, travel and other brands for actions by their governments or to pressure companies to conform to its official positions on Taiwan, Tibet and other sensitive issues.
Australian PM 'disgusted' over parliament sex scandal, vows to actA whistleblower said that government staff used the parliament's prayer room to have sex, and that sex workers had been brought into the building.
Montenegro urges EU not to tie its hands in anti-corruption fight
President Biden urged to move EU-backed war crimes court to Kosovo
EU helps struggling Moldova out of COVID-19 crisis, but the cash comes with conditions"Europe will never be a safe and prosperous place until the neighbourhood is also safe and prosperous" - EU Commissioner, Oliver Varhelyi, on the importance of the EU's Macro-Financial Assistance.
What is the EU's Covid-19 Macro-Financial Assistance to neighbouring countries?Through the Macro-Financial Assistance, the EU is giving €3 billion to ten enlargement and neighbourhood partners to help them limit the economic fallout of the coronavirus pandemic. Who is included and what are the conditions?
Exploring Vienna cafés: A look at coffee culture in Austria’s capital
Pressure mounts on Slovakia's PM to quit after two ministers resign
Armenia's parliament votes to lift martial law ahead of June electionsThe lifting of martial law, imposed at the start of the conflict with Azerbaijan over Nagorno-Karabakh last September, follows an agreement between PM Nikol Pashinyan's alliance and the opposition.
Myanmar junta frees hundreds held for anti-coup protestsThe prisoners appear to be the hundreds of students detained in early March while demonstrating against the February 1 coup that ousted the elected government of Aung San Suu Kyi.
Two former Spanish prime ministers to testify at slush fund trialThe trial centres on an alleged system of parallel accounting used to pay bonuses to People's Party leaders and collaborators.
North Korea slams EU sanctions as 'psychotic'
Penises are shrinking because of pollutionSperm count, testosterone levels, penile length and overall human fertility are all being harmed by pollution.
Banksy artwork raises more than €19 million for UK health service
EU must 'increase vaccine manufacturing capacities' says EMA chief
Israel election: Netanyahu appears short of majorityBoth Benjamin Netanyahu and his political rivals lack a clear path to a governing coalition, initial results show.
Nicola Sturgeon cleared of breaching ministerial codeThe investigation looked at whether Sturgeon had misled parliament over meetings she held with Salmond over harassment claims against him and whether she had attempted to influence the conduct of the investigation into them.
Could hydropower dams destroy Europe's last wild river?Rich biodiversity in the river Vjosa is being threatened by dam building.
Bibi again? Israelis vote as country emerges from virus restrictionsWill Israel's successful vaccine campaign save Benjamin Netanyahu his job?
Slovakia's Sputnik V crisis deepens as PM says he's willing to resign
EU agrees first sanctions on China in more than 30 years
You can't appease Russia. The EU mustn't lose its values trying | ViewEurope needs a two-track strategy on Russia: offer a helping hand to the growing numbers of discontented Russians and be ready to confront the Kremlin with resolve and systematically punishing its aggressions, argues Rostislav Valvoda.
In Myanmar's hinterland, army uproots ethnic Karen villagersIn Myanmar's hinterland, army uproots ethnic Karen villagers
COVID-19 vaccines: UK says 'world is watching' EU on export ban threat
Protests in Turkey after Erdogan ditches treaty protecting womenPresident Erdogan's announcement of Turkey's withdrawal from the Istanbul Convention has been brought outrage across Europe.
Congo election turmoil as opposition leader hospitalised with COVID-19Sassou N’Guesso is the third-longest serving president in Africa.
Thousands protest Netanyahu three days before Israel election
Albania begins vaccinating Kosovo medics against COVID-19
Alexander Lukashenko warns Belarus protesters: 'Be patient'The Belarusian opposition led by Sviatlana Tsikhanouskaya is hoping to start talks with the government in May -  if an online poll launched on Thursday gives her the mandate to enter negotiations.
Erdogan pulls Turkey out of treaty protecting women from violenceWomen's rights groups have called for protests after the Turkish president issued a decree annulling the country’s ratification of the Istanbul Convention.
A week after saying COVID-19 was under control, Bulgaria locks down“We might appear to make inconsistent decisions,” said Bulgaria's health minister Kostadin Angelov, announcing a tightening of restrictions.
'This is embarrassing': Norway PM breaks own government's COVID rules
In Ukraine, Stepan Bandera’s legacy is a political football... again
Mayor promises a greener future for the ancient city of Athens
Algerian passengers 'stuck' at Paris airport due to COVID constraintsA group of 25 have been stranded at Charles de Gaulle airport as they try to reach Algeria, where others also complain of being punished by the country's border closure.
Scotland’s First Minister ‘misled’ parliament over Salmond allegationsA committee has found Scotland’s First Minister Nicola Sturgeon “misled” the nation’s parliament over sexual assault allegations against her predecessor Alex Salmond.
Brussels considers visa restrictions against non-EU countriesThe European Commission may impose visa restrictions on third countries that refuse to take back their citizens who have tried to come into the EU unsuccessfully.
Will travel be possible this summer with the EU's Digital Green Certificate?
'I want to live not just survive': Kosovo and its brain drain problem
Spain legalises euthanasia and assisted suicide"Today we are a more human, fairer and freer country," said Prime Minister Pedro Sanchez after Spanish lawmakers approved the euthanasia bill on Thursday.
Armenia’s PM calls early elections in a bid to defuse political crisisBREAKING: Armenia’s PM calls early elections in a bid to defuse the country’s political crisis
Tanzania's President John Magufuli dies aged 61President John Magufuli of Tanzania, a prominent COVID-19 skeptic in Africa whose populist rule often cast his East African country in a harsh international spotlight, has died.
Mark Rutte's party wins Dutch general election: preliminary results
Dutch election: Rule change to accept wrongly sealed mail-in ballots
Voter fraud claims show Dutch far-right 'copying Trump's playbook'
Meet the anti-racism campaigner taking on the Dutch right wing
Sputnik V: Has Russia won the battle in global vaccine diplomacy?
What are the real reasons behind France's slow vaccine rollout?
Belarus protests: More than 400 convicted, hundreds more still in jail
Seychelles may become the first country to achieve herd immunity
Dutch election: Is online sexism holding women back from becoming MPs?A recent study found 10% of all tweets at women on Dutch electoral lists contained hateful comments or sexist threats.
French MPs approve law setting age of sexual consentAny sexual act committed on children under the age of 15 by an adult will be considered rape. The bill still needs to be approved by senators.
'Shadow Game' the big winner at the FIFDH"We have all been there, we all have been young and all experienced the same aspirations that they have" - Els van Driel, the film director of 'Shadow Game' tells all about her award-winning production.
Could Spain's four-day working week save the planet?More flexible working hours provide unexpected bonuses for both the environment and our wellbeing.
The Briefing: Why Syria’s war has always been Europe’s problem
UN says 'quiet diplomacy' between actors in Syria crucial to end war
Dutch elections: are parties under-delivering on Green policies?
All you need to know about the Dutch general election
Kim Jong-un's sister warns US against military drills with South Korea
Sarah Everard vigils held in UK intensify scrutiny into crime billThe government has come under fire with its proposed crime bill which detractors say does little to tackle violence against women and girls as the country reels from the murder of Sarah Everard.
'I might not live to see a free Syria,' activist tells Euronews
Netherlands election: Brexit fires Dutch debate over its place in EUAs voters head to the polls in the Netherlands this week, the country's place in the EU has sparked intense debate.
Spain's deputy PM quits role to stand in Madrid election
Kremlin opponent Navalny says he's detained in 'concentration camp'Navalny likened his detention conditions to "Orwell's 1984" in an Instagram post on Monday.
UK crime bill 'a missed opportunity' to tackle violence against womenThe murder of a young woman in London has put the issue under the spotlight.
EU begins legal action against UK over Brexit deal 'breaches'EU begins legal action against UK over 'breaches' related to the Northern Ireland protocol
Housing crisis emerges as major election issue as Netherlands votes
Syria’s war at 10: Meet two escapees who rebuilt their lives in Europe
Myanmar: Martial law imposed in parts of Yangon as deaths rise
Grammys: Female artists triumph as Beyoncé, Taylor Swift make history
At least 4 people shot dead in Myanmar anti-coup protestsAt least four people were shot dead during protests in Myanmar on Sunday, as security forces continued their violent crackdown against dissent following last month's military coup.
Bolivia's political crisis deepens after ex-interim president arrestedJeanine Anez, the conservative interim president who led Bolivia for a year, was arrested on Saturday and released after questioning.
In Mitrovica, a bridge that separates Albanians and Serbs | ExtractMitrovica's Main Bridge is both a symbol of the town’s division and its most popular tourist attraction.
Merkel's centre-right party defeated in two German state elections
Hundreds hold a vigil in Yangon against coup and to honour victimsPeople sat in the middle of the street, holding candles and singing songs.
Russian police detain participants at opposition forum in Moscow
Actor brings political message to César film awards
COVID in Europe: Italy and France concerned over rising cases
Are rising cases in vaccination-leading Serbia a warning to the UK?Serbia has been highlighted as a success story for its vaccination programme, but rising coronavirus cases have health experts worried.
Scots and Catalans look to each other to ease independence woes
Why criminalising ecocide won’t solve the climate crisis"Prison and criminalisation do not fix harm, they cause it."
Third conservative MP in Germany resigns amid corruption allegations
Mary Robinson gives her insight on Europe's biggest challenges"COVID has exacerbated all of the inequalities" - Mary Robinson, chair of the Elders, discusses the pressing issues affecting Europe today.
Plans to build an airport in Albania threatens migrating bird flywaysThe mayor of Vlora in Albania sees his region as the "future queen of the Mediterranean" and he's happy for infrastructural development to increase tourism. But plans to build an airport in an environmentally protected area are leaving bird experts horrified.
The plans to build an international airport dividing a countryThe Albanian government has plans to build an international airport in the city of Vlora. But the site for this airport is on an important migratory bird flyway and within an environmentally protected zone. The country wants to boost its economy, but at what cost?
Spain vs. Kosovo World Cup qualifier to go ahead with flags & anthemsSpain does not recognise Kosovo's declaration of independence from Serbia in 2008 but states that this month's match will go ahead with national flags and anthems under FIFA rules.
Poland set to resume logging in one of Europe's last primeval forests
Slovakia's health minister quits over buying Russia's COVID-19 vaccine
EU's 'vaccine passports' only valid with EMA-approved COVID jabsIt raises a potential problem for Europeans who have had the Russian or Chinese vaccine.
Germany 'super election year' starts with state and regional ballots
Millions of English daffodils left unpicked due to post-Brexit rules
French minister was "pressured" not to visit Polish 'LGBT-free' zones
Denmark, Iceland & Norway suspend AstraZeneca vaccinations
China endorses plan to tighten control of Hong Kong electionsThe Communist Party put forward plans which would reduce democratic representation in Hong Kong elections, following pro-democracy demonstrations in the region.
Puigdemont has lost his immunity from prosecution. What happens next?
EU rejects claim that European funds financed Lukashenko's 'goldmine'A new documentary film alleges that EU funds contributed to financing Lukashenko's regime and his lavish lifestyle. The bloc has rejected the accusations as "completely unfounded and baseless."
Madrid set for early elections after regional government collapses
Nearly half of EU citizens uninterested in having say on bloc's futureA Eurobarometer survey found that 48% of citizens do not want to be involved in the Conference on the Future of Europe, a continent-wide consultation of EU citizens on want they want from the bloc.
The race to stop Europe’s young and jobless from becoming a ‘lost generation’The pandemic has caused unemployment to rise throughout Europe. The under 29's have been particularly affected and are now having to compete with the newly unemployed with more experience. We take a look at what the EU is doing to improve employment for young people.
How has the pandemic affected youth unemployment?The pandemic has exacerbated youth unemployment problems in Europe. There are fewer work opportunities, and young people are competing with unemployed people with more experience. We look at what's being done to counteract this.
MEPs to debate making the EU an LGBT 'freedom zone'
Russia 'slows' Twitter over failure to remove banned contentRussia's media watchdog accuses the social network of failing to remove content related to drug use, suicide and child pornography. Twitter is also used widely by supporters of Kremlin critic Alexei Navalny.
Armenian anti-government protesters blockade Parliament in Yerevan
Biden waits as House set to vote on $1.9 trillion COVID-19 relief billThe massive package provides up to $1,400 direct payments to most Americans, extended emergency unemployment benefits and hundreds of billions for COVID-19 vaccines and treatments.
France 'underestimated nuclear tests impact' in French PolynesiaThe findings, published by the investigative journalism newsroom Disclose, suggest that the radiation levels caused by the tests were far greater than officially acknowledged.
'It's political persecution': Carles Puigdemont on losing his immunity
Russia wants apology after EMA official warns against Sputnik V jab
Puigdemont: 'Sad day' for democracy as MEPs vote to lift immunity
US climate envoy John Kerry kicks off Europe tour in LondonKerry is preparing for a major United Nations Cop26 in November with European allies.  The US has returned to the International Paris Climate Agreement under President Biden.
Myanmar junta orders shutdown of five media outletsAll five networks had been offering extensive live coverage of the protests. The military government has detained dozens of journalists since the coup.
Brazil judge dismisses Lula convictions, paving way for election runThe ruling opens the way for a showdown with far-right incumbent Jair Bolsonaro in next year’s elections.
Pope 'tired' as he returns from historic Iraq visit
Viktor Orban should become the agent of European integration | View"The best joke on Orban is to turn him into an undercover agent of European integration," writes Romanian MEP Dragoș Tudorache.
European Parliament to announce result of Puigdemont immunity vote
Greece launches investigation into alleged police violence in Athens
International Women's Day: Meet Belarus' women political prisonersOn the occasion of International Women's Day, Euronews highlights the stories of Belarus' female political prisoners and the leading role of women in the country's democratic opposition movement.
MEPs must vote against lifting Carles Puigdemont's immunity | ViewMEPs will on Monday (March 8) vote on whether to lift the parliamentary immunity of their Catalan colleagues Carles Puigdemont, Toni Comín and Clara Ponsatí.
MEPs must back vote to accurately count EU's fish stocks ǀ ViewMEPs will this week take part in a vote that will prove crucial to the future of our seas and the communities who depend on them, says the EU Fisheries Control Coalition
British lessons for Europe in managing a post-pandemic boom | ViewEurope needs a roaring twenties to recover from the pandemic. British history provides some clues.
China's annual congress: What's happened so farThe weeklong meeting of the National People’s Congress, which rubber stamps policies approved by the Communist Party leadership, provides a window into government priorities.
French billionaire MP Olivier Dassault dies in helicopter crash"His brutal death is a great loss," said French President Emmanuel Macron.
'Hell will freeze over first': Lithuania FM on Belarus extradition bid
The 16 most useful travel apps for planning your next trip
Pablo Hasel: Fresh protest in Spain over jailing of rapper's backers
US Senate approves $1.9 trillion COVID-19 relief billNot a single Republican voted in favour of the massive rescue package, highlighting the bitter partisan divisions that have characterized the early days of the Biden presidency.
Protests, tear gas in Myanmar after UN envoy urges action
4 killed in protests in wake of Senegal's opposition leader's arrestSupporters of Ousmane Sonko - a strong opponent of President Macky Sall and a popular with the country’s youth - say charges against him are politically motivated,
Long-term British expats set to reclaim right to vote in UK electionsThe UK government has vowed to scrap a law that bans British citizens - who have lived abroad for more than 15 years - from taking part in UK elections.
Russian communists remember Stalin on the anniversary of his deathRussian communists on Friday remembered former leader Joseph Stalin as they marked the 68th anniversary of his death.
Hungarian mayors battle government over financesOpposition mayors in Eastern Europe are raising their voices against corruption and populism. We take a look at Hungary where they're accusing the central government of deliberate financial cuts to opposition-led municipalities.
Protests continue over Lebanon's crippling economic crisisLebanese protesters continued to block major roads and highways in Beirut for a third straight day, over the crippling economic crisis in the country.
Europe's week: Orban leaves the EPP, as Brexit makes a dramatic returnWhile Hungarian Prime Minister Viktor Orban left the EPP Group after it changed its internal rules, MEPs delayed a decision on when to vote on the Brexit deal.
Can Hungary survive Viktor Orban?
Dakar disorder after arrest of Senegal's main opposition leaderClashes erupted in Senegal's capital Dakar on Thursday after the arrest of key opposition leader Ousmane Sonko.
Belarus asks Lithuania to extradite opposition leader Tsikhanouskaya
China announces 'over 6%' economic growth target, tech plansChina’s premier announced plans to make the nation self-reliant in technology amid tension with Washington and Europe over trade, Hong Kong and human rights.
Helena Dalli gives the latest on what the EU is doing to tackle inequalities
European Parliament delays vote on Brexit deal after UK 'violation'
Will the Czechs be the next to look to Russia and China for vaccines?
Bullets sent in envelope to Italy's former prime minister Matteo Renzi
'Stop murdering protesters,' says UN as Myanmar death toll hits 54"It is utterly abhorrent that security forces are firing live ammunition against peaceful protesters across the country," said UNHR chief Michelle Bachelet
European Medicines Agency starts review of Russia's COVID-19 vaccine
'Bloodiest day': At least 38 anti-coup protesters killed in MyanmarSecurity forces in Myanmar escalated their crackdown on protests against last month’s military coup, with at least 38 people killed on Wednesday.
UK announces £40bn of green investment from new ‘infrastructure bank’Environmental campaigners are critical of whether this will be a “real commitment to green growth”.
Hungary's rule of law stance left Fidesz isolated in EPP, says Weber
EU vaccine passports might not be ready by the summer. Here’s why
Hungary PM Orban’s party quits largest group in European Parliament
What has Rishi Sunak announced during the UK's 2021 Budget?The British government on Wednesday announced new measures to provide a lifeline to workers and businesses hit by the COVID-19 pandemic.
Merkel calls for 'fundamental rethink' at CDP Europe Awards 2021
Will COVID-19 spark reform of the EU's borderless Schengen Area?Euronews looks at recent border restrictions prompted by coronavirus variants and what they mean for the future of free movement in Europe.
Poland clears LGBT activists of putting rainbow on Roman Catholic icon
Egyptians rejected asylum in Sweden and fearing persecution back homeA number of Egyptian asylum seekers - some facing life imprisonment in Egypt - are making a last-ditch attempt to avoid deportation following decisions made by Sweden’s asylum agency.
Romania's ex-minister sentenced for corruption and money-laundering
Mikhail Gorbachev, last Soviet leader, turns 90 in quarantineGorbachev, who is widely credited with ending the Cold War, was very popular in the West, but a much more polarising figure within Russia.
US father and son extradited to Japan over Carlos Ghosn's escapeMichael Taylor and his son, Peter Taylor, will be tried on charges that they smuggled Ghosn out of the country in 2019.
Winston Churchill landscape owned by Angelina Jolie sells for €9.5mThe Moroccan landscape painted by Britain’s wartime leader was sold by Angelina Jolie at an auction for more than €9.5 million.
I'm deeply concerned over Georgia's political crisis, says EU's MichelEuropean Council President Charles Michel brought Georgia's ruling and opposition parties together in Tbilisi during his visit Monday, in an attempt to mediate the situation in the country.
20 years on, the disappeared still cast shadows in northern Kosovo
Conservative French MPs support ex-President Sarkozy after conviction
This is Europe’s first cross-border mobile hospitalThe French and Spanish Pyrenees regions get help with medical emergencies from the European project EGALURG. Its self-reliant mobile hospital also brings COVID-19 vaccine relief to rural communities.
The European mobile medical lorry fighting COVID-19THE EGALURG cross-border cooperation project has created a medical lorry to help with medical emergencies in rural areas across the Pyrenees.
Amid political unrest, Armenia's PM says he's ready for snap elections
Austria has failed in fight against corruption, says Council of Europe
Former president of FC Barcelona released after ‘Barçagate’ arrestJosep Maria Bartomeu was arrested on Monday as part of an investigation into an alleged smear campaign against figures at the football club, dubbed ‘Barçagate’.
France's ex-president, Nicolas Sarkozy, given jail term for corruption
Protesters in Buenos Aires decry COVID vaccine scandalDemonstrators left "body bags" depicting coronavirus deaths in front of the Government House with signs reading: "I was waiting for the vaccine but it was given to Alberto's (President Alberto Fernandez) friends."
Trump hints at running in 2024, says he won't start another party
Myanmar: Aung San Suu Kyi charged with new offences
Myanmar's UN envoy sacked after speech opposing coup in his country
Armenian president refuses order to dismiss army chief
Russians mark sixth anniversary of opposition figure Nemtsov's killing
Boris Nemtsov: Thousands pay tribute on sixth anniversary of murderThousands of Russians, as well as some western diplomats, have marked the sixth anniversary of the assassination of opposition leader Boris Nemtsov.
Joe Biden visits Texas amid recovery effort from deadly winter stormMore than a million people in the state are still under orders to boil water before drinking it after millions lost power and water pipes burst in an extreme cold snap.
Myanmar's UN envoy opposes coup in dramatic speech"We will continue to fight for a government which is of the people, by the people, for the people,'' Ambassador Kyaw Moe Tun told the UN General Assembly in a surprise speech on Friday.
Armenia’s PM says the army attempted a coup. What’s really going on?
France-based Uighur group sues Nike for 'complicity in forced labour'The sports brand is accused of sub-contracting Chinese factories using forced Uighur labour
New EU sanctions on Russia 'are a missed chance to fix relations'
Former North Macedonia police chief sentenced over wiretapping scandal
Turkey slams Dutch bid to recognise massacre of Armenians as genocide
Protesters gather in Georgia over opposition leader's arrestProtesters gathered in Tbilisi, Georgia over the arrest earlier in the week of opposition leader Nika Melia.
Closures on Iberian peninsula make life tough for cross-border workers
Biden talks 'human rights' in Saudi call ahead of Khashoggi report
Belgium’s slow rollout ‘absurd’ with so many vaccines made in country"It is absurd and a bit surreal that vaccines produced here in Belgium end up more easily in the UK or in Israel."
Facebook picks a side, banning Myanmar military from their platformsFacebook said on Thursday they have removed all of the remaining military accounts with immediate effect.
Armenia's Prime Minister accuses military chiefs of 'attempted coup'"What happened today is that some people tried to put our military staff in a non-democratic process and a military coup," said Pashinyan to his supporters.
Australia passes law to make Google and Facebook pay for news
Venezuela expels top EU diplomat over new sanctions
EU criticises Poland abortion ban as it reminds it to 'respect rights'
EU 'must give Libya more autonomy' over stopping Europe-bound migrantsEuronews spoke to Admiral Fabio Agostini, head of the EU mission to enforce the Libyan arms embargo in the Mediterranean Sea, who said that more autonomy must be given to the war-torn country.
In Kosovo, an uncertain future for the war crimes court nobody wanted
Puigdemont vows to keep fighting after MEPs vote to lift his immunity
Will publishing salaries help gender equality in Europe's workplaces?There's still a pay gap between men and women in Europe. So what's being done to create better parity? Real Economy takes a look at how The European Pillar of Social Rights and its pay transparency directive are influencing EU social policies on gender.
Why does gender inequality in Europe still exist?Real Economy explains the ins and outs of gender inequality in Europe's workplace and solutions to level the financial planning field.
MEPs to personally investigate Frontex amid pushback allegations
EU-Mercosur trade deal 'suicide' without green clauses, says MEPBut Brazil's ambassador to the EU says the bloc would be missing out on a great opportunity if it failed to ratify the trade deal.
Reporters under fire: Journalists around the world face death threats
Netherlands eases lockdown but extends curfew through March 15
Crackdown urged on alleged misinformation on US televisionTwo Democratic members of the US Congress have urged a dozen cable, satellite, and streaming TV companies to crack down on health and political misinformation.
Poet John Keats 'brought back to life' 200 years after his deathHow the Romantic poet lives on: scientists from the Institute for Digital Archaeology have 'virtually recreated him' thanks to Computer Generated Imagery.
Why a rapper’s arrest has led to carnage on the streets of BarcelonaFor more than a week protests have raged over the jailing of rapper Pablo Hasél, whose sentence has ignited a heated debate over freedom of expression in Spain.
Protecting the sea gives glimmer of hope to fish stocks in the AdriaticFish stocks in the Mediterranean Sea have dropped to alarming levels due to decades of overfishing. Coastal states fear an impending collapse of fisheries. But in a protected part of the Adriatic Sea between Croatia and Italy, fish populations are recovering. Is this the solution?
One of Latvia's richest men is jailed for bribery and money launderingThe businessman is regarded as one of the most influential figures in Latvian politics.
Spain marks 40 years since failed paramilitary coup attemptThe coup was declared a failure when the king appeared on television to support the new democratic government. Before his televised speech, the country had been holding its breath for the 18 hours that the ordeal at the Parliament lasted.
What is a zero-COVID strategy and could it be implemented in Europe?
Greece: 5,000 students gather outside courthouse over campus securitytktk
Georgian police arrest opposition leader Nika Melia after storming HQShortly afterward, they sprayed tear gas and forced their way into a room that had been barricaded by Melia and his supporters.
Lam backs Hong Kong electoral changes excluding opponents
Georgian police storm opposition HQ to arrest leader Nika MeliaMelia, chairman of the United National Movement, is accused of organising “mass violence” during anti-government protests in 2019.
North Macedonia issues arrest warrant for former secret police chiefMijalkov, a first cousin of conservative former Prime Minister Nikola Gruevski, is accused of masterminding phone taps on more than 20,000 people, including politicians, judges and journalists between 2006-2016.
Lukashenko 'grateful' for Russian aid as Belarus leader meets Putin"The money hasn't been thrown to the wind," Lukashenko told Putin amid reports he had come to Russia seeking another loan for Belarus.
Myanmar military has Facebook page taken down after deadly protestsThe official Facebook page of Myanmar's military was removed for "repeated violations", the social network said.
Will Europe's financial capitals steal London's crown, post-Brexit?Boris Johnson said Brexit would enable the City of London to 'prosper as never before'.  But the winners so far are the likes of Amsterdam, Dublin, Frankfurt and Paris.
Reopening England's schools 'could spark a rise in COVID-19 cases'"Government modellers have indicated opening schools, both primary and secondary, will probably increase the infection rate at a time when we're not getting anything like enough protection from the vaccine."
Thousands march in Myanmar's capital as military warns protestersThe military junta warned it was prepared to use lethal force against rallies inciting "riot and anarchy".
French ministers condemn Lyon mayor over meatless school mealsGrégory Doucet, the Green Party mayor of Lyon, said the measure to impose a meatless single menu in schools was taken to comply with COVID-19 sanitary measures and flagged that his right-wing predecessor did the same following the first lockdown.
Brexit: DUP launches legal challenge to Northern Ireland Protocol
Myanmar: Thousands defy junta's threats to protest military coup
Iran agrees to maintain nuclear surveillance temporarilyIran’s parliament in December approved a bill that would suspend part of UN inspections of its nuclear facilities if European signatories do not provide relief from oil and banking sanctions by Tuesday, February 23.
Myanmar protests: Crowds back on streets after fatalities
Shops smashed and looted in Barcelona as Pablo Hasél protests continue
Former director of Greece’s National Theatre charged with rapeDimitris Lignadis, a well-known stage actor and director in Greece, turned himself in to police on Saturday afternoon.
US deports former Nazi concentration camp guard, 95, to GermanyFriedrich Karl Berger, 95, who moved to Tennessee in 1959, admitted to being a former concentration camp guard. He denies being an alleged "accomplice" in the deaths of camp prisoners.
Sputnik V: Why hasn't the EU approved Russia's COVID vaccine yet?EU leaders have expressed their concerns about the use of the Russian vaccine amid fears Russia will use it to extend its influence in the bloc.
A guide to Europe's most overrated tourist attractions
With Draghi, Italy has a chance to set aside Conte’s economic misadventures ǀ ViewIn moments of acute crisis, Italy relies on apolitical technocrats to make difficult decisions and demonstrate the long-term thinking its elected politicians cannot. It thus falls to Draghi to craft Italy's recovery.
Argentine health minister forced to resign amid COVID vaccine scandalThe scandal erupted after journalist Horacio Verbitsky said he received preferential treatment from the health ministry to get vaccinated against COVID-19.
Dutch senators approve new coronavirus curfew law in late night voteThe government, which is appealing the decision by a judge to strike down the curfew, succeeded in gaining some opposition support for the new law.
Pablo Hasél: Spain sees 4th night of riots as government shows strainCracks in the Spanish government have begun to show over the Pablo Hasél case and the handling of the street violence his arrest has stirred up.
Mollaei takes silver in Tel AvivDay Two of the Tel Aviv Judo Grand Slam was a special day for International sport and for Israel, with all eyes on Saeid Mollaei
Albania sees Kurti comment on unity with Kosovo as a distant vision"One thing is clear - Albania and Kosovo must be brought closer on all levels and must cooperate as two countries that share one common goal,” said Minister of State for Relations with Parliament, Elisa Spiropali.
Illegal landfill sites along rivers in the Balkans are causing an ecology disaster
Irakli Gharibashvili set to return as Georgia's prime minister
New drone footage shows what a decade of war has done to Syria
Netherlands appeals court set to rule on coronavirus curfew legalityPM Mark Rutte said he expected to win the case against the restrictions brought by civil liberties campaigners
Third night of violence in Spain over rap artist Pablo Hasél's jailingNearly 80 people have been arrested and more than 100 injured since Tuesday amid a furore over free speech and use of violence by Hasél's supporters and police.
COVID-19 vaccines: Macron proposes sending 3-5% of supplies to AfricaIn an interview with the Financial Times, the French President said he would put the idea to Friday's meeting of G7 leaders.
Portuguese President orders constitutional review of euthanasia lawThe President said the legislation appears "excessively imprecise," potentially creating a situation of "legal uncertainty." The law was approved by a significant majority in parliament three weeks ago.
NATO to increase training in Iraq but delays decision on AfghanistanWith a May 1st deadline looming, defence ministers from the NATO military alliance have chosen to delay a decision on whether to withdraw forces from Afghanistan.
COVID, crisis & the constitution: Is Czech Republic set for change?With elections due in the autumn, it's not looking great for the ruling party in the Czech Republic. Here's why.
EU is 'ready to impose new sanctions' against Russia over Navalny
Have Russia and China got enough COVID-19 vaccines to sell abroad?Moscow and Beijing are pushing their homemade jabs abroad. But, what about their own populations?
What links a Bosnian village and NASA's historic bid to land on Mars?
Kurti's comments spark pessimism in Belgrade over Kosovo-Serbia talksSerbia has not reacted well to an interview Kosovo election winner Albin Kurti gave to Euronews.
Two Belarusian journalists jailed for two years for covering protestAndreyeva and Chultsova join the ranks of journalists already prosecuted for their role in covering the ongoing political unrest in Belarus following the disputed presidential elections in August.
Seiko Hashimoto takes over as Tokyo Olympic presidentSeiko Hashimoto was named as president of the Tokyo Olympic organising committee in Japan, where women are still rare in the boardrooms and positions of political power.
Georgia's ruling party appoints new PM amid calls for fresh electionsThe governing Georgian Dream party selected the defence minister to take over as prime minister following the sudden resignation of Giorgi Gakharia over the attempts to detain an opposition leader.
Facebook blocks news content in Australia over proposed media law
These three millennials are fighting for climate solutions in EuropeThey might be 'Gen Z', but these youngsters are the future of a green EU.
EU must take 'urgent steps over Poland's human rights violations'CIVICUS, which track civic freedoms, put Poland on its human rights watchlist over the government's alleged attacks on judicial independence, women's rights, media independence and LGBTIQ+ people.
Russia rejects European rights court's order to free Alexei NavalnyThe European Court of Human Rights had demanded that Russia free Navalny immediately, warning that failing to do so would mark a breach of the European human rights convention.
New Italy PM Mario Draghi easily wins vote of confidence in SenateThe new government of national unity, drawing together elements across Italy's political spectrum, is also expected to win a similar vote in the lower house of the Italian parliament.
Why has deepening the Danube River become a political dispute?
Protesters in Myanmar call for release of Aung San Suu Kyi
I would vote to unify Albania and Kosovo, says election winner KurtiKosovo opposition leader and election winner Albin Kurti says that if a referendum was held on his country joining Albania, he would vote yes.
French MPs back law aimed at cracking down on Islamic radicalism
Here's all you need to know about France's new separatism law
France rules out counter-terrorism troops withdrawal from Sahel"We are there because we have a shared destiny with the Sahel. If the Sahel falls into the hands of terrorism, Africa will gradually fall into the hands of Islamic terrorists and Europe will live the consequences," said Macron.
Kurti has vowed to change Kosovo. He has a fight on his hands  | View
Slovenian PM Janez Jansa survives confidence vote
Catalonia elections: Has the result made independence more likely?Sunday's elections in Spain's Catalonia region gave separatists a boost in the regional parliament.
Kosovo could try to move war crimes court to Pristina, judge warns
Bill Gates says getting to zero emissions will be 'best thing we've ever done'
What will Italy’s new PM Mario Draghi mean for Italians and the EU?
EU asks Hungary to keep liberal radio station on the air
'It's 100% the solution': EU holds firm over Northern Ireland Protocol
Czech PM Babis defies MPs to extend COVID-19 state of emergency
Myanmar coup: Protesters try to reach NLD headquarters in Yangon
Left-wing reformist party led by former PM Kurti wins Kosovo electionAn anti-corruption and anti-establishment party, Vetëvendosje, has won the election in Kosovo, held amid the worsening coronavirus situation in the country.
Russia: Valentine's Day flashlight protests demand Navalny's releaseThe protest, dubbed "Love is stronger than fear," was called by Navalny's allies for Valentine's Day in solidarity with people detained in recent opposition protests.
Thousands defy military in Myanmar to continue anti-coup protestsThousands of protesters in Myanmar have defied a ban on gatherings by the military who ousted the elected government two weeks ago.
Kosovans vote for new govt to tackle COVID-19 and corruption
Separatist movement put to test as Catalonia votes despite pandemic
Why I’m shunning Valentine’s Day for the sake of the environmentFrankie Leach explains why boycotting February 14th is the most eco-friendly thing you'll do all year.
Could COVID-19 help oust pro-independence parties in Catalonia?
Donald Trump acquitted in Senate impeachment trial after Democrats fail to secure enough votes
Sambistas perform to open Rio's would-be carnival season
Haitians clash with police as they demand president's resignationProtesters say the president's term ended last Sunday; however, the incumbent insists he has another year left.
Myanmar: Tensions high as arrests mount amid more anti-coup protestsProtesters have defied a ban on public gatherings to as anti-coup demonstrations continue, while the authorities have stepped up the arrests of politicians and activists.
Trump impeachment trial: Senate vote close after witness row resolved
Myanmar protesters defy ban on gatherings to march against the coup
UN passes watered down resolution over Myanmar military coup
Ukraine sides with US over Chinese takeover of engine companyAnalysts believe the decision could lead to a cooling of the relationship between Ukraine and China, with the latter in turn looking to Russia for closer relations.
Former ECB chief Mario Draghi sworn in as Italy's new PM
The unheard pain of abortion in Poland
Facebook curb content shared by Myanmar military onlineFacebook has pledged to reduce the distribution of all content on Facebook pages and profiles run by the Myanmar Military “Tatmadaw”, as well as accounts linked to the armed forces spokesperson Brigadier-General Zaw Min Tun.
Europe's week: Borrell and von der Leyen face their criticsThey came out to defend themselves amid criticism over a diplomatic visit to Russia and the EU's vaccine rollout strategy.
Czech MPs refuse to extend pandemic-related state of emergency
France has become Serbia's new best friend in the EU | View"When President Vučić wants to talk with Europe, he will dial Macron’s number", argues Vuk Vuksanovic, an associate at LSE Ideas.
Catalonia prepares to head to polls for Sunday's regional elections
Haitian police fire tear gas on hundreds of protestersHaitian police fire tear gas on hundreds of protesters
Russian opposition leader Navalny back in court on slander charges
Tokyo 2020 president resigns over derogatory comments about women
Women's rights activist charged for role in Polish protestsA leader of the Polish Women’s Strike, the movement that has led mass nationwide protests against a near total abortion ban in Poland, has been charged with criminal felonies.
Italian populist party supports Mario Draghi government in online vote
'A sham': Critics slam Lukashenko's alleged bid to reform BelarusLukashenko, in power for over 26 years, declared to the 2,700 delegates present on Thursday that they would be able to draft constitutional reforms. The opposition has branded it a sham.
Greek students protest 'university police' plans over freedom fearsSupporters of the reform, due to be approved by lawmakers on Thursday, argue that Greek universities have long been plagued by violence and those against it are afraid it will hinder freedom of expression.
Draghi is Italy’s best hope but the issues he'll face are huge | ViewThe fact Draghi's government depends on such a disparate group of political parties will restrict his room for manoeuvre and make it hard to reach consensus, argues Dr Luigi Scazzieri
Netherlands offers payment of 'appreciation' to Srebrenica veterans
Can Italy's disparate parties realign themselves under Mario Draghi?Cecilia Sottilotta, Assistant Professor of International Relations and Global Politics at the American University of Rome says it's difficult to believe these very diverse parties are actually coming together.
Countries curb diplomatic ties and weigh sanctions on Myanmar
Is the UK making too much of the EU's blunder over Northern Ireland?The row has provided ammunition to some calling for agreed post-Brexit arrangements over Northern Ireland to be scrapped.
Younger generation bring colour to Myanmar coup protestsStreet protests against last week's military coup continued on Wednesday.
A sixth election in 12 years reveals growing pains of a young Kosovo
France seeks to change age of consent to protect children from abuse
EU's multi-billion pandemic recovery fund gets go-ahead from European ParliamentThe European Parliament has voted to approve the EU's Recovery and Resilience Facility, to get the economy back on its feet whilst paving the way to a green transition. We take a look at a green hydrogen plant in France hoping to take advantage of its funds.
Getting Europe back on its feet: the Recovery and Resilience Facility
Marine Le Pen faces court for tweeting images of Islamic State crimes
Von der Leyen defends EU vaccine plan but admits mistakes over IrelandSpeaking before the European Parliament, the President of the European Commission said the EU's common vaccine strategy was the right thing to do in the name of European solidarity.
Myanmar protesters back on streets despite police violence
US Senate declares that Trump impeachment trial is constitutionalThe Senate voted mostly along party lines that Trump's second impeachment trial was constitutional even though he has left office.
Sciences Po director Frédéric Mion resigns over Duhamel incest scandalMion resigned over the accusations against Olivier Duhamel, the former president of the foundation that oversees the political science school.
'A predictable mistake': MEPs slam Borrell over Moscow trip
Dutch government urged to recognise 1915 Armenia massacre as genocide
Meet the Belarusians in Lithuania who fled political crisis back homeHundreds of Belarusians have fled to Lithuania since the disputed presidential election in August.
Fresh blow to press freedom in Hungary as Klubrádió forced off airIn a statement last week, the National Associated of Hungarian Journalists called Klubradio "the only remaining public service broadcaster in Hungary whose content is not under government influence".
China 'blocks' political discussion app ClubhouseThe app allowed people in China to engage in political discussions with people outside of the country, on topics such as democracy and Taiwan.
Myanmar protests continue with police repressionMyanmar protests continue with police repression
MP stopped from speaking in parliament because he wasn't wearing a tie
Mario Draghi enters final day of talks to form Italy's next government
Six months on, has Lukashenko seen off calls for change in Belarus?
All you need to know about Donald Trump's second impeachment trial
Europe's recovery must focus on investment, says ECB chief
Russia's COVID-linked death toll increases after statistical changeAccording to Rosstat, 162,429 people died with COVID-19 last year in Russia — much higher than the 77,068 deaths reported by Russian officials.
Norway approves Utøya memorial for victims of 2011 massacre
Israeli Prime Minister denies corruption charges
Germany, Poland & Sweden expel Russian diplomats in tit-for-tat actionMoscow expelled three European diplomats last week for attending demonstrations in support in Alexei Navalny. The EU member states say their diplomats were observing the events.
Greek PM Kyriakos Mitsotakis accused of breaking COVID-19 rules again
What is COVAX and is it helping poor countries get access to vaccines?
Objects thrown at Spain's Vox party leader during election campaign
Why Moscow is a 'truly cinematic' city to explore
Europe shows its support for Belarus Solidarity DayThe day was called by the leadership of the opposition, based in Lithuania.
In Liechtenstein, 38,378 of the world's wealthiest go to the polls
Myanmar coup: Tensions rise between protesters and police
Italy: Salvini on board as two parties back a Draghi-led governmentThe populist 5-Star Movement and the right-wing League both signaled support for a Draghi-led government, saying they were ready to put aside bitter rivalries in the national interest.
Switzerland marks 50 years of women's vote and mulls gender gap todayThe European nation prides itself on being one of the world's oldest democracies and yet only allowed women to vote as late as 1971.
Libya factions agree interim presidential council ahead of electionsRival factions in Libya agree on an interim presidential council to lead the country into elections in December.
One protester on why he took to the streets over Dutch COVID curfew"Why do we need to first vaccinate 90-year-olds?" asked Marcel R. "From my point of view, no one needs to live to 110. I'd rather my children be able to go to a café or a concert."
Myanmar coup: Junta blocks internet as anti-coup protests spread
ICC clears way for war crimes probe of Israeli actionsThe International Criminal Court said that its jurisdiction extends to territories occupied by Israel in the 1967 Mideast war, clearing the way for its chief prosecutor to open a war crimes probe into Israeli military actions.
Students rally against coup at Myanmar campusStudents came out to demand that soldiers return to their barracks, release the country's detained leaders, including Aung San Suu Kyi, and restore democracy.
Denmark’s first artificial energy island will power 3 million homesThe country has just made a huge investment to move away from a history of fossil fuel production.
How can we resolve the migration mismanagement in Bosnia and Herzegovina?Euronews' Hans von der Brelie speaks to the Head of the Delegation of the European Union to Bosnia and Herzegovina, Johann Sattler, in Sarajevo to discuss the migration mismanagement there.
Russia expels European diplomats over attending pro-Navalny protests
China threatens retaliation over cancellation of CGTN's UK licenceThe Chinese foreign ministry threatened retaliation after CGTN's licence to broadcast in the UK was suddenly removed by Ofcom on Thursday.
The most striking images from this week's top stories
Alexei Navalny slams Kremlin 'PR project' in court defamation case
Myanmar coup: UN backs return of democracy and release of detaineesUN Security-General Antonio Guterres said everything possible would be done to mobilise international pressure "to make sure that this coup fails".
Trump rejects Democrats' request to testify at impeachment trial
Republican extremist Marjorie Taylor Greene voted off House committees
Beirut blast: Six months on, people are still hunting for justiceThe incident on August 4, which saw 2,750 tonnes of improperly stored ammonium nitrate explode, killed more than 200 people.
Denmark's ex-immigration minister quits party before impeachment trial
Podcast | The European origins of today's homophobia in Africa
Borrell: EU-Russia ties at 'lowest' ebb but no new Navalny sanctions
UK regulator Ofcom revokes CGTN's licence to broadcast in the UKA bid to switch the licence to an entity called CGTNC was also stopped it its tracks, as the media outlet is ultimately controlled by the Chinese Communist Party, Ofcom said.
Head of Tokyo 2020 Olympic Games says he won't resign over sexism row
Myanmar blocks Facebook amid growing resistance to coup
Democrats plan vote on ousting Marjorie Taylor Greene from panelsThe US House will vote on whether to remove Rep. Marjorie Taylor Greene from her committees over the Republican's embrace of conspiracy theories and violent racist views.
Protesters call for Tokyo to act over military coup in MyanmarThe coup came earlier this week as the country's new parliament was set to sit for the first time following elections last year.
Why do countries see vaccination as a race against each other?
Russians will look to EU's Borrell for stance on Navalny furore | ViewPhilippe Dam, from Human Rights Watch, on what EU foreign affairs chief Josep Borrell must tell Russia on his visit to Moscow this week.
France found guilty of climate inaction in 'historic victory'A Paris court has ruled that France is guilty of not meeting commitments to curb emissions in a groundbreaking lawsuit.
Ex-ECB chief Mario Draghi accepts mandate to form Italian government
Yangon residents protest against the coup by banging pots and pansPeople waited until 8 pm (local time) when they began hitting pots and pans on the street.
Detained Myanmar leader Aung San Suu Kyi charged with trade violationDetained Myanmar leader Aung San Suu Kyi charged with trade violation and remanded in custody
UN Security Council takes no action on Myanmar coup
Hundreds detained in protests after Alexei Navalny given jail term
Could 'competent and credible' Draghi be the right man for Italy?Cecilia Sottilotta is an Assistant Professor of International Relations and Global Politics at the American University of Rome. She told Euronews that "Draghi really embodies every single quality that no politician currently has in Italy - he is competent."
'No justice, no judiciary': Belarus crisis exposed rule of law issue“Under a dictatorship, there cannot be independent judges and courts," said disbarred lawyer Alexander Pylchenko. "Our country is not an exception."
Twitter removes 'hateful' LGBT comments by Turkey's Interior Minister
Italy's president set to hear solutions for country's political crisis
Serbian PM: Vaccine success down to prioritising health over politics
COVID-19 has slowed repatriation of foreign children in Syrian campsAccording to Save the Children, an estimated 200 foreign children were repatriated in 2020 from camps in north-east Syria, down from 685 in 2019.
EU leaders condemn Russia's jailing of Kremlin critic Alexei Navalny
Myanmar coup: US threatens sanctions over Aung San Suu Kyi detention
What can be done about the military coup in Myanmar?
'Wholly unnecessary': Criticism mounts on Brussels over vaccine furore
How did European leaders react to Myanmar's military coup?
Making Zorrotzaurre the 'Manhattan of Bilbao'The AS Fabrik project is turning one of Bilbao's old industrial zones into a space for startups and new industries to face the challenges of the digital economy.
Service-based technology for an improved industrial sectorLuís Berasategi Retegi, coordinator at Urban Laboratories, part of the AS Fabrik project tells us how they're helping to improve industry through training and entrepreneurship.
Montenegro wants to join the EU - but does Brussels want it?
Anti-lockdown protests continue in Belgium, Austria and Slovenia
Myanmar coup: Military takes control after detaining Aung San Suu Kyi
Thousands join in Jerusalem funeral, flout pandemic rulesThousands of ultra-Orthodox Israelis attended a rabbi's funeral, flouting the country's ban on large public gatherings during the pandemic.
Trump parts with impeachment lawyers a week before trialFormer President Donald Trump has parted ways with his lead impeachment lawyers just over a week before his Senate trial.
Thousands flee Hong Kong for UK, fearing China crackdownThousands of Hong Kongers are moving to Britain since Beijing imposed a strict national security law on the Chinese territory last summer.
Italian parties continue talks to bid to solve political crisisPolitical parties in Italy are in talks to end the political crisis over the country's economic recovery after Giuseppe Conte stepped down as prime minister.
WHO investigators visit Wuhan live animal market in COVID-19 probeThe market was the site of a December 2019 outbreak of the virus. Scientists initially suspected the virus came from wild animals sold in the market. The market has since been largely ruled out but it could provide hints to how the virus spread so widely.
Out of Europe, Britain looks to the Pacific for new trade partnersUK trade with the Pacific partner nations was worth 111 billion pounds in 2019 - around six times less than the business it conducts with the EU.
Romania: Protests after hospital fire leaves at least five people dead
WHO official says vaccine export bans 'not helpful' in COVID fight
China: WHO investigators visit second Wuhan hospital
Arctic Refuge oil drilling: delayed or halted?One of the last untouched ecosystems in the world has just narrowly escaped oil drilling for the time being.
Portuguese MPs vote for euthanasia, bringing new law a step closerThe proposed law allowing euthanasia and assisted suicide for terminally ill and gravely injured people now goes to Portugal's President for approval.
How can we travel to remote communities while still being ethical?
China withdraws passport recognition amid Hong Kong UK visa rowBritain says it will open a visa scheme to Hong Kongers from Sunday, but China says it 'interferes in China's internal affairs'
WHO team visits Wuhan hospital that had early COVID patients
What are the real reasons behind the EU's slow vaccine rollout?
Navalny warns Russian regime as court rejects his appeal for releaseThe opposition leader used his court appearance to tell the Russian government: “Yes, you have the power now to put me in handcuffs, but it's not going to last forever.”
Boris Johnson travels to hospital laboratory in Glasgow amid lockdownPrime Minister Boris Johnson travelled to Scotland on Thursday to laud the rapid rollout of coronavirus vaccines across the United Kingdom
Germany considers stopping flights from countries with COVID variantsThe country is set to take "drastic measures" to stop the spread of coronavirus variants, with plans to stop flights from the UK, Brazil, South Africa and Portugal.
EU is 'stuck between a rock and a hard place' on vaccine rollout"The problem for the European Commission is going to be once the rollout happens, it's not going to get the credit. The member states ... are going to take the credit," said Finland's ex-PM Alexander Stubb
EU migration chief welcomes Frontex suspension of operations in Hungary
'We can't wait any longer': Biden signs orders on climate crisisThe directives aim to offset the worst effects of global warming, and include plans to conserve land and water, double offshore wind energy, and move to an all-electric federal vehicle fleet.
Right-wing extremist given life for murder of pro-migrant German MPStephan Ernst was convicted for shooting dead a pro-migrant regional politician at his home in 2019. An alleged accomplice was given a suspended sentence.
Meet the TikTok stars using viral videos to save the planetEcoTok has harnessed the video sharing app to help Gen Z to see themselves in climate related careers.
Police raid offices and apartments of jailed Kremlin critic NavalnyThe raids come after protests across Russia at the weekend demanding the release of Navalny.
Polish MP suspended by ruling party after taking COVID-19 vaccine
Why the riots in the Netherlands go beyond a COVID curfewViolence rocked Dutch towns and cities for successive nights after a curfew to stop the spread of coronavirus was imposed. It is just the tip of the iceberg when it comes to grievances with the government.
Nikos Dendias and Péter Szijjártó break down the EU's pending issues
Can the Green Deal help the EU economy through the pandemic?In this edition of Real Economy, we take a look at the European Green Deal and the role of the European Social Fund (ESF) in creating new green jobs and supporting training in green skills.
How is Europe transitioning to the green side?
Nord Stream 2: MEPs and US pressure Germany to stop Russia pipeline
Thousands of Indian farmers back to protest PM Modi's farming lawsOne protester was killed and 80 police injured after farmers stormed a symbolic fort in New Delhi on India's Republic Day in a mass protest on Tuesday against PM Narendra Modi.
Brussels concerned that Italy crisis will delay pandemic spending
Former Kosovo PM barred from February 14 general election
Netherlands welcomes US return to the climate change debateThe virtual meeting aimed to produce an agenda for dealing with effects such as rising sea levels, extreme weather and crop failure.
Italy issues emergency decree to avoid Olympic suspensionThe IOC has taken issue with the Italian government’s formation of a new organisation, “Sport e Salute,” that was created at the start of 2019 to run the country’s sports finances.
MEPs push for workers to have the right to digitally disconnect
Putin says lavish palace featured in Navalny video is 'manipulation'
Should the UK help save French-owned Eurostar from the brink of ruin?
House delivers Trump impeachment article to SenateArguments in the Senate trial will begin the week of Feb. 8, and the case against Trump, the first former president to face an impeachment trial.
Italy: Talks on new government to start after PM Conte resigns
Legal bid seeks to stop Malta's political parties owning TV stationsIn a historic case that could change the face of the Maltese media, one independent news outlet is taking on the political establishment to restore impartiality to the airwaves.
No EU agreement for sanctions on Russia over Alexei Navalny arrest
Why might veganism be more popular with women than men?It turns out that meat and masculinity are linked.
Kaja Kallas to become Estonia's first female prime minister
Human rights lawyers in Turkey face threats and detention | View
Emmanuel Macron promises crackdown on incest following online campaign
Biden signs orders to kick-start economic recovery
More than 3,000 arrested in Russia at huge protests for Alexei Navalny
Meet the cycling obsessed family who spend their lives on the roadSafe, accessible roads are "the biggest gift we can give our children."
'Heavy-handed' tactics likely from Moscow at pro-Navalny ralliesProtests are planned across 60 Russian cities on Saturday in support of jailed opposition leader Alexei Navalny
Renew Europe expels Lithuanian MEP for homophobic comments
Europe's week: Brussels eager for a new start after Biden inauguration
#MeTooInceste: French share stories of family sexual abuse
From vaccine creation to trepidation: France's struggle with anti-vaxxersFrance has one of western Europe's highest rates of distrust in modern-day vaccines. On Unreported Europe we take a look at why, what anti-vaxxers have to say and what can bring sceptics rounds.
Portugal election: turnout fears and power struggles amid lockdown
Republicans push to delay Trump's impeachment trial until FebruaryHouse Democrats have already voted to impeach Trump for a second time over charges he incited the assault by his supporters on the US Capitol building which left five people dead.
US judge rules Amazon won't have to restore Parler web serviceFavoured by Trump supporters, Parler was removed from the Google and Apple app stores and kicked off Amazon's its web-hosting service following violence at the US Capitol.
Biden signs string of COVID orders and vows 'help is on the way'
China marches to Serbia's aid as EU's vaccine scheme fails to deliverWhile the whole region was waiting to get at least some vaccines from the COVAX scheme, a plane from China landed in Belgrade with a million doses on board.
Podcast | A dilemma of coming-out in patriarchal societies
Has the EU's vaccine rollout lost Brussels support in poorer nations?Edi Rama, PM of EU hopeful Albania, has already hit out at Brussels over its "morally and politically unacceptable" vaccine rollout.
Is the far-right gaining popularity in Portugal?Portugal will head to the polls on Sunday to choose a new President, despite pandemic lockdown measures still in place. We take a look at Chega!, a right-wing party pushing to get through to the second round.
'Just move on': US Republicans grapple with post-Trump futureWith Democrats in control of the White House and Congress, Republicans face profound questions about what the party stands for without Donald Trump in charge.
Bejing slaps sanctions on 'anti-China' Trump officials
Joe Biden implores Americans to unite in first speech as US president
Deb Haaland: The Indigenous woman making US political historyCongresswoman Deb Haaland has been approved by the US Senate to serve as cabinet secretary in the Biden administration.
EU migration chief urges Frontex to clarify pushback allegations
EU diplomats on how the bloc is preparing for Biden's administration
Watch: Donald Trump leaves the White House for the final timeTrump, who departed the White House shortly after 14:00 CET with his wife, Melania, said it had been "a great honour, the honour of a lifetime" to serve as president.
Who is US vice president Kamala Harris?The top ranks of American politics have historically been dominated by men, almost all of them white. That's now coming to an end.
What is the new US Vice President's environmental background?Kamala Harris makes history today as the first woman to ever be VP, but she has interesting climate credentials too.
America's 46th President: Joe Biden's long road to the White House
How will the UK-US special relationship play out under Joe Biden?
Trump's final address: 'I fought for you, I fought for your family'
Joseph R Biden Jr inaugurated as 46th president of the United States
The EU must prevent the COVID vaccine roll-out creating two-tier societies ǀ ViewRegardless of how keen governments are to roll out the vaccine, it’s likely that some groups in society will be slower to receive it, leading to unequal access and curtailed freedoms.
Kim Jong Un greets senior officials after congressNorth Korean state media released more video of leader Kim Jong Un posing for group photos with new line-ups of senior officials of the ruling Workers' Party and the Cabinet, following recent landmark leadership meetings this month
What does the Biden administration have in store for the UK?
Biden and Harris mark America's COVID grief on eve of inauguration
Italian PM Giuseppe Conte's government survives Senate confidence voteGiuseppe Conte's government has survived a no-confidence vote in the Italian Senate after winning a similar vote in the lower house on Monday.
Five ways the Biden inauguration will be different from previous ones
What are the real reasons behind Bosnia's migrant crisis?
Italy's fragile government will continue despite turmoil, says expert"This is going to remain a fragile government based on a rather brittle majority," said political scientist Giovanni Orsina
How did US President Donald Trump impact Europe over his four years?
Trump baby blimp retired to museum ahead of Biden inaugurationA six-metre-high blimp depicting a nappy-wearing baby Donald Trump has been added to the Museum of London's collection.
Most Europeans say US political system is broken ahead of inauguration
Men's Ice Hockey world cup pulls out of Belarus over safety issuesThe International Ice Hockey Federation (IIHF) said "it is currently impossible to ensure the welfare of teams, spectators and officials while holding a World Championship in Belarus."
Melania Trump bids farewell as US First Lady in video messageMelania Trump said the past four years have been "unforgettable" and urged Americans to "be passionate in everything you do but always remember that violence is never the answer and will never be justified".
Italy's Senate to hold confidence vote on Giuseppe Conte's governmentItaly's prime minister is fighting for political survival after former leader Matteo Renzi pulled his party's support from the government.
Kosovo artist creates Joe Biden portrait using grains and seedsAn artist in Kosovo made a portrait of the US President-elect using grain and seeds ahead of his inauguration this week.
Navalny 'not cut from the same cloth' as other politicians in the West"Alexei Navalny's ideas and hopes for his country come before his own personal ambitions and safety," Red Notice author Bill Browder told Euronews.
Why do so few people in France want to take the COVID-19 vaccine?
Adrinet: an initiative exorcising the Mediterranean's 'ghost nets'
What's the best way to get rid of the 'Ghost Nets' haunting our seas?Elisabetta Bonerba is a project leader at the Adrinet programme, an EU funded initiative to alleviate plastic pollution in the Adriatic seabed. She tells us how best to deal with 'Ghost Nets' haunting our seas.
What impact will a Biden presidency have on coal-dependent Poland?
Did the COVID pandemic alter the course of climate change?
'Alarming factions': Here's why the US Capitol siege happenedThe events of January 6 were not a one-off. They were the culmination of various pro-Trump factions coming together "under his banner" for a common cause, experts tell Euronews.
Italy's coalition can 'hold its head high' PM says to avoid collapseGuiseppe Conte is fighting for political survival after former Prime Minister Matteo Renzi pulled his party's support from the government last Wednesday.
Who are the key figures nominated to be in Joe Biden's cabinet?
French Muslims leaders back secular values in 'charter of principles'The French Council of Muslim Worship (CFCM) also backed the creation of a council that will vouch imams preaching on French soil to reduce interference from other countries.
Brexit ‘loophole’ allows UK to ignore EU ban on plastic waste exports
Alexei Navalny urges supporters to take to the streets and protest
Protesters in Jerusalem continue calls for PM Netanyahu to resignWeekly protests continue in Jerusalem calling on Prime Minister Benyamin Netanyahu to step down over corruption charges
Protests continue in Tunisia against the police and economic crisis
NRA declares bankruptcy and plans to incorporate in Texas
‘This is civil disobedience’: Rome restaurants defy COVID-19 closures
Armin Laschet elected new leader of Germany's CDU party
YouTube removes video of Austrian MP over 'COVID-19 misinformation'Herbert Kickl claimed that children would play "not the slightest role" in spreading the virus.
Europe's week: Dutch and Italian crises, Pompeo snubbed by EU
Fareed Zakaria's 'Post-Pandemic World'
Swiss to vote in referendum on government's COVID-19 measures
EU vaccine plan 'morally and politically unjustified', says Albania PM
Dutch government resigns amid child welfare benefits scandal
Belarus: High-profile media arrests are a 'tactic to shut down press'
Turkey faces its most severe drought in a decade
Italy's Prime Minister to address parliament on political crisis
Slovenia resumes funding for national press agency after EU pressure
Artists lockdown at Italian theatre to create a play about confinementThe play will be performed for one night only when theatres are allowed to reopen across Italy.
Denmark’s ex-immigraton minister set to face impeachment trial
Sign up to Euronews' new Green newsletterYour weekly recap of eco news and green views, straight to your inbox.
Who’s hoping to be the CDU’s new leader and Germany’s next chancellor?
European stocks rise as traders anticipate Biden's COVID recovery plan
Georgia's parliament passes amnesty law to release 1,500 prisoners"The opposition claims Georgia Dream passed this law as a payback to the criminal world for the help they got during the election. In the past criminals have helped the ruling party by pressuring people during the campaign," claims former minister Thorniké Gordadze.
Uganda votes in tense election as crackdown on opposition continues
China: WHO inspectors arrive in Wuhan to probe COVID-19 origins
Polish officials call for trial over killing of Gdansk mayor
EU bids to boost Europe's connectivity with 600 low-orbit satellitesThe EU wants to launch 600 new low-orbit satellites into space to enhance communication and connectivity for European citizens.
Which destinations need tourism most to survive after COVID-19?
Why are so many Serbian doctors dying of COVID-19?
Finland's former Prime Minister assaulted outside Parliament
Italy's government in crisis after junior coalition partner quits
The EU scheme making 'SURE' unemployment stays low
The EU's 'SURE' financial aid explainedLearn how the EU's 'SURE' initiative is keeping unemployment at bay during the pandemic by boosting financial aid to furlough schemes in member states.
Pompeo cancels EU trip amid apparent 'snub' by LuxembourgLuxembourg declined to comment on the reason,  but confirmed the planned trip had been cancelled.
How to rebrand a country after a global pandemicAfter a global pandemic that has had a devastating impact on countries which rely on foreign income from tourism, our experts discuss how they can rebound
Kremlin critic Alexei Navalny will return to Russia on January 17
Estonian prime minister Juri Ratas resigns amid corruption allegations
Watch: House votes to impeach Donald Trump for second time
Brussels-Beijing deal could threaten cooperation with US on ChinaThe EU's landmark agreement with Beijing could complicate transatlantic cooperation on China after Biden's team signalled disapproval of the deal.
Has Malta changed since PM Joseph Muscat resigned a year ago?New prime minister Robert Abela has been in power in Malta for a year since his predecessor resigned under public pressure. Critics think not much on the island has changed.
All the pets in the White House over the last 40 yearsPresident-elect Joe Biden will be holding an "indoguration" this year for his rescue pups.
Which two German words were judged the ugliest of 2020?Each January, a jury of German linguists picks out what it calls the "non-word" of the year: a word that’s ugly because of what it means.
Brussels warns Slovenia over press agency funding row
'We're super tired of this war': Life on Brazil's COVID-19 frontline
Manatee with ‘Trump’ carved on its back prompts criminal investigation
Donald Trump's Twitter ban is 'problematic,' says Angela Merkel
China expands lockdowns, cancels summit, amid new COVID-19 outbreak
Belarus: Alexander Lukashenko mocks U.S. over Capitol violence
Reading stabbings: Libyan sentenced to life for deadly UK park attackKhairi Saadallah was sentenced Monday to life in prison with no chance of parole for stabbing three male friends to death in an English park in June.
Trump loyalists 'driven deeper into internet' after social media bans
Europe's space leaders seek to boost sector, starting in BrusselsJan Wörner, Director-General of the European Space Agency, talks to Euronews about the challenges the space sector faces in 2021.
Private clinics start ordering COVID-19 jabs in Brazil
Arnie's warning highlights danger of US 'spinning out of control'
Golf championship pulled from Trump hotel over Capitol Hill riot
When things go wrong: How EU and US can end their presidents' terms
Democrats introduce bill to impeach Trump over Washington DC violence
Pro-Trump supporters who stormed Capitol Hill arrested and charged
What is Parler, the 'free-speech' platform tech giants are shunning?Here's what you need to know about the platform and why it is facing bans from the top app stores.
Democrats want nuclear codes taken away from 'unhinged' Trump
Europe's week: 'democracy is not a given, we have to protect it' says French MEP Loiseau
US Capitol riot shows disparity of police attitude to protesters' race
We should cherish Europe's democracy daily, says MEP after US violence
What does Brexit mean for those travelling to and from the UK?
EU no longer recognises Juan Guaidó as Venezuela's interim presidentThe European Union has dropped its recognition of Juan Guaidó as Venezuela's interim president after he lost his position as head of its parliament.
How Trump's house of cards has tumbled in his final days as president
'This was four years in the making': Trump blamed for US violence
Podcast | The story of when Dakar was the “gay capital” of West Africa
Trump has accounts on Facebook and Instagram blocked 'indefinitely'
Iraq issues arrest warrant for Trump over Soleimani killing
Latvia sacks its health minister in a pandemic
In pictures: Guns drawn as lawmakers scramble amid US Capitol breach
Egypt’s Giza Pyramids are getting a revamp to boost tourism
What does a Democrat-run Senate mean for the Biden administration?From cabinet appointments to coronavirus legislation, Biden's ability to enact his agenda hinged on the outcome of Georgia's two Senate run-offs.
Romania to introduce law against anti-Roma hate speech
Why are Czechs among Europe’s most sceptical over taking vaccines?
Pope appeals for calm after disputed Central African Republic election
Euronews Romania to launch - a new independent channel in Romanian
EU calls for immediate release of over 50 detained Hong Kong activists
Qatar and Saudi Arabia officially end three-year feud at GCC summitThe boycott of Qatar by its Arab neighbours in 2017 was designed to weaken the country's emir, Sheikh Tamim bin Hamad al-Thani, but it only emboldened the young leader and led to a surge of domestic support.
Nine Brexit deal claims by Boris or his ministers that are untrueThe UK prime minister and his government has made some questionable assertions about Brexit, particularly the EU-UK trade deal struck on Christmas Eve.
The UK is struggling badly against COVID-19 — here's why and how
Alastair Campbell slams UK government for mixed messaging over COVID
Heartwarming harmony as Balkans unify in Croatia’s hour of needTensions persist between Croatia and Serbia after the devastating wars in the 1990s. But they have been put aside as the region unifies to help Zagreb after Tuesday's deadly earthquake.
Anger after Swedish official breaks his own agency's COVID guidelines
This cross-border cycle path links Spain to the Atlantic Pyrenees
The cycling project providing a gateway to the Iberian Peninsula
Nancy Pelosi reelected Speaker as US Congress opens new session
Brian Urquhart, early leader of United Nations, dies at 101
Tibetan exiles choose new leaderThe election took place in India's northern city of Dharamsala, which is home to Tibet's government-in-exile.
Things to do in locked down Paris
Iran-US tensions high a year after killing of military chief SoleimaniThere are fears of a renewed US-Iran clash a year after the US drone killing of the Revolutionary Guard chief, in the dying days of Donald Trump's presidency.
US Congress overrides Trump's defense bill veto in 'resounding rebuke'
EU leaders blast Bosnia after army sets up tents for freezing migrantsThe Bosnian army was sent to erect tents as shelter for hundreds of migrants at the burnt-out Lipa camp after protests.
Europe's week: Out with the old, in with the new
Erdoğan promises reforms in 2021, but abuses leave critics unconvinced
What is on the climate activist agenda for 2021?
Hundreds of migrants stranded in freezing conditions at Bosnia camp
Beyond coronavirus: The news stories that shaped Europe in 2020The coronavirus pandemic is not the only event to touch the lives of Europeans. Here are just some of the stories to make the headlines during the year of COVID-19.
COVID-19 dominated but this is what else shaped the world in 2020No-one could escape COVID-19 in 2020, but the pandemic was not the only event to have rocked the world in this year.
COVID-19: Greek government's ‘vaccination selfies’ spark anger
'Desperate situation': Migrants return to fire-hit camp in Bosnia
'A farce and failure': Experts slam MPs' scrutiny of post-Brexit deal
Is Romania's environment ministry run by a hunter who dislikes bears?In the past, Barna Tanczos has called for the culling of 4,000 bears and warned against turning Romania into "the zoo of Europe".
Yemen: At least 16 dead and 60 wounded in blast at airport in Aden
Harry and Meghan release podcast with special message from son Archie
Vote over Trump's call to increase COVID-19 relief checks is blocked
Russia imposes retaliatory sanctions on senior German officials
History is made as EU chiefs and UK PM sign post-Brexit trade deal
Argentina has just legalised abortion - here's why it's big news
Bangladesh navy ships take 1,700 Rohingya to isolated islandThe 1,700 refugees were selected because of their willingness to be moved to the island, which the Bangladeshi government said could accommodate 100,000 people.
COVID helped cut homelessness in Europe. But what about post-pandemic?
‘We either have to win or fail trying’: The climate activists of 2020
Thirteen detained during rallies in Belarus, says rights group
MIllions in US on brink of losing job benefits as shutdown loomsCongress has approved a $900 billion stimulus package but President Trump is blocking it.
Navalny ally under investigation for 'threatening' FSB agentPolice raided the home of activist Lyubov Sobol on Christmas day after she knocked at the door of an alleged FSB agent who Alexei Navalny says took part in the plot to poison him.
Christmas in times of coronavirus, from Bethlehem to RomeFrom Bethlehem to Rome and beyond, coronavirus restrictions dampened Christmas Eve celebrations on Thursday.
EU and UK unveil 1,246-page post-Brexit trade deal
Brexit deal: what steps do both sides need to take to ratify the pact?
Now that Britain and the EU have a deal, what happens next?
Macron out of quarantine after showing no COVID-19 symptoms
New round of Trump clemency benefits Manafort, other alliesTrump pardoned more than two dozen people, including former campaign chairman Paul Manafort and Charles Kushner, the father of his son-in-law.
More than 100 killed in latest ethnic massacre in EthiopiaThe attack in Metekel zone of Benishangul-Gumuz region occurred a day after Prime Minister Abiy Ahmed visited the region and spoke about the need to end such massacres.
EU to spend hundreds of millions more on refugees in Turkey
Moldova’s pro-Russian prime minister Ion Chicu resigns
Final goodbye: Recalling influential figures lost in 2020From Ruth Bader Ginsburg to Sean Connery, Euronews recalls some influential figures lost in 2020 and the legacies they left behind.
How 2020 was the year European solidarity was tested
Review of the Year: What challenges lie ahead in 2021?
Review of the Year: winds of protest in the East
Review of the Year: Turkey takes the path of assertive independenceIts candidacy for EU membership long-since rebuffed, Turkey appears more firmly set than ever on a path of assertive independence. Where it leads, will be a major issue in the year to come.
Five non-coronavirus stories that shaped the world in 2020Even without the coronavirus pandemic, 2020 was a year of monumental stories that will shape the world in the years to come.
Human rights court orders Turkey to release Kurdish leader Demirtaş
How did Merkel fair in last German EU presidency under her leadership?
Kosovo to hold unprecedented early election after court rulingThe country's constitutional court ruled that fresh elections were needed after invaliding the current government installed in June. The lawmaker who cast the deciding vote in its favour to rule the country is now in prison.
Israel on cusp of fourth national election in two yearsIsraelis face a fourth outing to the ballot box in two years after the ruling parties failed to reach a compromise to stave off an automatic dissolution of parliament and fresh elections.
Romania: Three pro-European parties come together to form a government
Europe's major ports are ready for Brexit. Here's how they did it
How the crisis in Belarus is politicising a new wave of street artists
Bosnian city of Mostar holds first local elections in 12 yearsResidents have watched the infrastructure around them crumble while local political and ethnic forces quarrel over who gets to run the city.
Brexit negotiations continue as MEPs’ deadline to approve deal passesThe deadline set by the European Parliament for the UK and EU to agree a Brexit deal was passed on Sunday, but talks are set to continue on Monday.
Official: Large car bomb kills 9 in Afghan capitalOfficial: Large car bomb kills 9 in Afghan capital
Israeli PM kicks off national vaccination campaign with public jabThe event gave Netanyahu a political boost as the Israeli PM faces criticism for his management of the coronavirus crisis.
Slovenia's health minister steps down amid virus pandemicSlovenia’s health minister resigned after his party left the country's ruling centre-right coalition.
Afghanistan: 'Rickshaw bomb' kills children in eastern Gilan districtAt least 15 children were killed and 20 others wounded by a bomb attached to a rickshaw, according to a provincial government official.
Post-Brexit deal: How exactly do the EU-UK positions differ?
Macron in 'stable condition' after COVID-19 diagnosis, doctor says
Why COVID-19 shows that migrants’ integration in Europe is as important as ever ǀ View
French MPs approve return of looted artefacts to Benin and SenegalBenin is to receive 26 artefacts plundered from the Palace of Behanzin in 1892, including a throne, while a sword and its sheath will be restituted to Senegal.
Biden picks Native American Deb Haaland for interior secretary"A voice like mine has never been a Cabinet secretary or at the head of the Department of Interior," Haaland said, vowing to be "fierce".
Majority of Spanish MPs vote in favour of law allowing euthanasiaThe conservative opposition parties voted against the government's assisted dying bill, with one party claiming the law was "a defeat for everyone, a failure for our health system and our society".
Tunisian activists protest surveillance a decade on from Arab Spring
Podcast | What it’s like to be a gay man in Senegal
If Kremlin had been behind Navalny poisoning, he'd be dead, says PutinHe made the claim during his annual marathon press conference on Thursday.
Hungarian MEP has wrists slapped over Gestapo comparisonOthers, however, want stronger action. Like throwing Fidesz out of the EPP grouping altogether.
Sviatlana Tsikhanouskaya: EU sanctions against Belarus not enough
What does 2021 hold for jobs and businesses in Europe?
How has the coronavirus pandemic affected the economy in Europe?We take a look at how the pandemic has impacted the European economy in 2020 and what the future may hold.
Belarus opposition leader Tsikhanouskaya awarded EU’s Sakharov Prize
Turning the page? Republicans acknowledge Biden's victory
Team of experts to travel to China in search of coronavirus originThe mission is expected to start next month and continue for four-to-five weeks.
How to bring up the climate crisis at the holiday dinner table
Turkish-EU relations: Why won't the bloc take a hard line on Turkey?
What's ahead for the EU on trade and finances?Euronews correspondent, Meabh McMahon, speaks to the EU commissioner for financial services, financial stability and Capital Markets Union, Mairead McGuinness, to discuss Brexit, the COVID recovery plan and the banking union.
Dayton Agreement at 25: How is the peace deal viewed today in Serbia?The Dayton Agreement was a peace deal signed 25 years ago to end the 1992-1995 Bosnian War.
How Japan is assisting foreigners during the COVID-19 pandemic
Digital Service Act: EU vows to 'put order into chaos' with tech laws
Bosnia's Muslim and Croat leaders boycott Russia's foreign minister
Hungarian parliament adopts package of anti-LGBT lawsHungarian parliament adopts anti-LGBT laws including de facto ban on adoption by same-sex couples
EU lawmakers should be careful what they wish for when it comes to Internet regulation ǀ ViewThe publication of the Digital Services Act by the EU will be a first step in providing a legal environment for tech companies. But Internet regulation must not create any unintended consequences for the way we communicate online.
Russian President Putin congratulates Joe Biden on US election win
Biden hits out at Trump after Electoral College confirms victory
Wuhan river swimmers happy to be back after virus lockdown
Barnier hints at Brexit progress as French minister slams UK 'madness'
US electoral college to cast formal vote for Biden as next presidentThe process set by law is usually a formality but has gained more attention this year due to Donald Trump’s efforts to subvert the 2020 election results.
The rule of law deal that saved Angela Merkel’s legacy ǀ View
UK, EU say post-Brexit trade talks will continue past Sunday deadline
Tempers flare as Trump supporters rally in WashingtonClashes broke out and police said at least 23 people were arrested.
UK plans to use Royal Navy ships to stop EU fishing boats slammed
Maryland volunteers distribute food as pandemic creates rising hungerPeople queuing to get food from distribution centres has become an increasingly common scene across the US as people struggle to feed themselves amid the ongoing pandemic.
Fresh clashes in Tirana over death of man shot by police during curfewThe clashes are becoming a flashpoint between the Socialist government and the centre-right opposition party who have demanded the prime minister's resignation.
Ethiopia's 'forced returns' of Tigray refugees 'disturbing,' says UNThe UN said the move to return Tigray refugees from the camps they fled from in Eritrea broke international law if confirmed.
Austria's constitutional court rules headscarf ban 'unconstitutional'The constitutional court in Austria ruled that a 2019 law banning girls under the age of 10 from wearing religious headscarves at school is "unconstitutional".
Antoine Griezmann: What will the response be from Barcelona and China?
Man behind Austria's 'ibizagate' scandal arrested in Germany
Five years on, is Europe on track to hit Paris climate deal targets?
An alternative to Hollywood - The film Industry turns to Dubai
EU27 leaders agree to cut greenhouse gas emissions 55% by 2030
New Year's Peeve? France to impose nighttime curfew on December 31
EU agrees €1.8 tr budget - but what brought Hungary & Poland onboard?
How has Finland's female-led government fared in its first year?
'What planet are you on?': EU urged to do more over climate crisis
'A call to action': Nobel Peace Prize awarded to World Food ProgrammeThis year's Nobel Peace Prize was awarded to the UN World Food Programme at a ceremony in Rome.
More than 400 female climate leaders call for COP26 gender equalityWith less than 25 per cent of influential positions filled by women, female climate leaders are concerned.
Hunter Biden, Joe Biden's son, investigated over his taxes
Brexit and budget deadlock set to overshadow EU summit in BrusselsIt's crunch time in Brussels, as European leaders meet physically for the first time since October.
'Completely irrational': Skopje anger at Bulgaria’s EU membership veto
Feeling bl-EU? Budapest and Warsaw light up opposition to budget veto
Can the post-Brexit transition period be extended? If not, why not?
Which Europeans are likely to be most hesitant about a COVID vaccine?
Blank book on why Matteo Salvini deserves respect becomes a bestsellerThe €6.99 paperback was first released in February 2019 but made it top of the Amazon bestseller list in Italy on December 4.
'Firm decision' to be made on UK-EU trade talks by Sunday, leaders say
'Preliminary agreement' reached over EU budget veto, says Poland
Greek political dispute over lockdown escalates
'Guilty of defending my country': Lukashenko hits out at Olympic ban
How a far-right party came from nowhere to shock in Romania's election
Danish PM apologises to Greenland children over 1951 social experiment
Bonga: The portrait of a revolutionary singerFamous Angolan singer, Bonga, has been an athlete and stood up against colonial rule. His music is known worldwide and continues to inspire.
China condemns new US sanctions over Hong Kong security law
Bulgaria's block on North Macedonia 'endangers Europe's security'Bulgaria wants North Macedonia to formally recognise that its language has Bulgarian roots, and to stamp out what it says is anti-Bulgarian rhetoric.
MPs throw furniture as political turmoil grips DRCIt came a day after President Félix Tshisekedi announced the end of the governing coalition
11 environmental books to buy for the Greta Thunberg in your lifePlus a few recommendations for the newly climate curious.
Joe Biden picks ex-general Lloyd Austin as defence secretary — sources
EU agrees its own 'Magnitsky' regime to sanction human rights abuses
France to deepen relations with Egypt despite human rights divergences
Hungarian MP berates former Fidesz MEP using drainpipe in parliament
Brexit deal looking 'very tricky', UK PM says ahead of Brussels talks
Polgár hopes Netflix series will help close giant gender gap in chess
Romania PM Ludovic Orban resigns after narrow election defeatRomania PM Ludovic Orban resigns after narrow election defeat to left-leaning populists
Barnier 'gloomy' on progress amid final drive for Brexit trade deal
France, Germany and UK brand Iran’s nuclear plans ‘deeply worrying’
Romania election: Social democrats ahead with 90% of ballots counted
Judge orders Trump administration to take new DACA applications
Nearly 100 arrested during another anti-security law protest in France
How do temperature changes in the Pacific ocean shift the weather across continents?With better understanding of the El Niño-La Niña phenomenon and better seasonal forecasts, industries can make better choices to adapt to future fluctuations in their activities.
China criticises Danish politicians in feud over Hong Kong activist
Will apathy be the winner in Romania's parliamentary election?
Health is not a cost, it's an Investment,Some of the winners of the 2020 MEP Awards, organised by The Parliament Magazine, speak exclusively to Euronews.
What does the UAE’s art and cultural scene look like post COVID-19?Vibrant, diverse, and plentiful are a few words that describe the UAE’s culture and art scene, which also serves as a hub for regional creatives stemming from the Middle East and North Africa to share their work, before the pandemic.
'Historic turning point': Denmark to end fossil fuel era by 2050
Europe's week: UK's vaccine boost and an illegal sex partyA look back at the key stories from the centre of the EU in Brussels.
NASA recruits companies to collect moon rock for as little as $1
Manchester: A tier three guide to the UK’s Northern PowerhouseLifelong Mancunian and Euronews Travel journalist Sarah Palmer takes us through the very best of the UK’s second city.
Ethiopian forces 'blocking' Tigray refugees from entering SudanRefugees fleeing the violence in the Tigray region were stopped from reaching the busiest crossing point for refugees on the Sudanese border, according to the latest reports.
Irish government criticised for rejecting pay for medical students
What does the MEP sex scandal tell us about Viktor Orban's Hungary?
Thousands protest after Moldova's new president stripped of key power
‘There is no vaccine for climate change’, warns British scientist
EU will lose supremacy unless it invests more, diplomacy chief tells Euronews“If you intend to be autonomous, you have to pay your own expenses,” the EU’s High Representative for Foreign Affairs told Euronews Brussels Correspondent Ana Lazaro Bosch in The Global Conversation.
NATO meeting: US-Turkey row takes centre stage as FMs discuss China
MEP Awards in Brussels celebrates the year’s top European lawmakersThe Parliament Magazine's 2020 MEP Awards took place on Tuesday night, with Bulgarian MEP, Eva Maydell playing host. Several MEPs were awarded prizes in their respective categories, ranging from international trade to the environment.
Meet Kamya Buch: Digital nomad, spiritualist and truth seeker
Iran's president opposes bill that would boost uranium enrichmentThe bill would suspend U.N. inspections and require the government to resume enriching uranium to 20% if European nations fail to provide relief from crippling U.S. sanctions on the country's oil and banking sectors.
Ex-French leader Valery Giscard d'Estaing dies at 94
Israel moves towards fourth election in two years with Knesset voteDogged by in-fighting, Israel's fragile coalition government is gearing up for a fourth election in two years after three previous polls produced inconclusive results.
Hungarian MEP facing expulsion from EPP group over Gestapo commentsFidesz MEP Tamas Deutch compared EPP head Manfred Weber to the Gestapo amid an ongoing dispute between Hungary and the EU over the bloc's budget.
MEPs accuse Budapest of hypocrisy over Brussels sex party scandal
Tributes paid to those killed when a car drove into shoppers in Trier
Brexit talks endgame: Does the political will exist to strike a deal?
Supreme court increases jail term for killer of journalist Jan Kuciak
NATO Foreign Ministers look to broaden scope for next decade
Belarus opposition to compile register of alleged police abuses
One der Leyen: How has EU chief Ursula done in her first year?
Brussels 'sex party': MEP József Szájer fled along a gutter with drugs
Trier: Five dead after car hits pedestrians in west German cityA nine-month-old baby is among the victims, police said, adding that the suspect did not appear to have a 'political or religious motive'.
Europe’s overreach with the Recovery Fund may spell the end of the euro ǀ ViewBetween governance mechanisms, assessment criteria, anti-corruption provisions, and basic rule of law principles, the fight to get the EU's Recovery Fund over the line is shaping up to be only half the battle.
Joe Biden has finally got access to the top-secret security briefing
War crimes tweet further sours China-Australia relations
Belarusian musicians playing prison blues as protest strategy changes
What is Remembrance Day for Lost Species and why does it matter?Award-winning writers, actors and creatives are coming together to mourn animals already lost to extinction.
French government to 'totally rewrite' controversial security measure
What's behind the public spat between Serbia and Montenegro?
Pro-democracy protesters march once again in BangkokProtesters gathered in Bangkok on Sunday, in another of a long series of pro-democracy demonstrations calling for reforms of both the government and the monarchy.
Montenegro and Serbia expel respective ambassadors in tit for tatThe diplomatic incident between Montenegro and Serbia adds to already tense relations between the Balkan states that were part of the same country until an independence referendum in 2006.
Sins of the fathers: Ireland’s sex abuse survivors
Pro-democracy protesters rally again in BangkokProtesters were out again in Bangkok and so were their inflatable yellow ducks.
Is Black Friday overshadowing Native American Heritage Day?
Is Lithuania's female-led government a sign of improved equality?
Britain 'to reject' EU offer to return 18% of fish caught in UK watersChief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier was reportedly set to make the offer after meeting EU fisheries ministers on Friday
What is land inequality and how does it threaten women?The issue of ownership and access to land is important for the environment too.
Will last gasp Brexit negotiations bear fruit this weekend?
Independent commission to examine France's controversial security lawArticle 24 of the proposed bill makes it illegal to share images of law enforcement officers for "malicious purposes". The proposed bill comes as "shocking" and "unbearable" images of police violence were released in recent days.
Hungary and Poland maintain united front blocking EU COVID-19 fund
This robot in Japan can detect if customers aren't wearing face masksIt's been introduced into a shop in Japan to ensure customers are following COVID-19 guidelines.
There are no male feminists | View
Is Europe's far-right using coronavirus as a new avenue of agitation?
French ski resorts to open at Christmas but lifts will remain closed
Brexit: Is there enough time left to ratify a UK-EU trade deal?
Ethiopian PM orders army to attack Tigray region's capital
Far-right terrorism 'is surging' in Western countries, report warns
MEPs vote for easier repair of phones, in end to big tech's monopolyThe European Parliament passed a report on Wednesday, recommending to the Commission that they propose regulations to give consumers the right to repair their electronic devices outside of the company they buy them from without devaluing the product, in a major blow to big tech companies.
Defiant pro-democracy protesters rally in BangkokThe protesters want the monarchy reformed to make it more accountable.
Brexit: Taoiseach hopeful of EU-UK deal but says trust has eroded
UK minister resigns as plan to cut overseas aid sparks outcry
EU vows to put gender equality at heart of its foreign aidTo mark the International Day for the Elimination of Violence Against Women on Wednesday, Brussels pledged that 85% of its aid projects will be about empowering women by 2025.
UK economy suffers 'largest fall in output for 300 years', says SunakThe UK finance minister has told parliament that the economic emergency is only just beginning, as he outlines the government's spending plans.
Is anti-Semitism on the rise in Germany among COVID-denial movements?
Car with anti-globalisation message crashes into Merkel's office gates
Poland abortion protests reflect a deep schism in country's societyProtests have raged in Poland following a court ruling that imposed a near-total ban on abortion.
UK equalities watchdog says windrush report finds 'serious injustices'
'America is back': Biden pushes past Trump era with nominees
Poland: Police using 'excessive violence' against peaceful protesters
Serbia's Aleksandar Vucic bet big on Donald Trump and lost. Now what?
French lawmakers approve controversial global security bill
'Let's rebuild a strong EU-USA alliance', EU chiefs tell Joe Biden
President-elect Joe Biden appoints John Kerry as 'climate envoy'
Coronavirus: Is vaccine scepticism the next hurdle to overcome?
Belgrade's Biden conundrum: How US-Serbian relations will shape up post-Trump ǀ View
Coronavirus: England arrivals will be able to cut quarantine with test
Hong Kong’s Joshua Wong taken into custody after guilty plea
Trial of former French president Nicolas Sarkozy to start on Monday
US election 2020: Trump campaign requests full recount of Georgia voteThe results of the state, which has traditionally been a Republican stronghold, were certified on Friday after a recount by hand confirmed Joe Biden's win.
EU urges reforms in Bosnia on 25th anniversary of peace dealAfter meeting with members of the country’s tripartite presidency, the EU's top diplomat said Bosnia’s "future is European" but that in order to get there "authorities must step up their efforts to deliver on the reform priorities."
School students lead third pro-democracy rally in a week in BangkokThe students defied government threats to crack down on Thailand's pro-democracy protest movement which is demanding sweeping changes to the constitution, including the monarch's rights and privileges.
Watch: Protesters in Paris call for new security law to be droppedJournalists and rights organisations have criticised the new law, arguing that it shields French police from scrutiny.
Dayton Agreement 25 years on: Bosnia's future hangs in the balance
How are political cartoonists in the MENA region drawing attention to social issues?The lot of political cartoonists in the Middle East & North Africa region is not an easy one.
Serbian Orthodox Church leader dies from COVID-19, aged 90
Brexit deal text '95% done' but key issues could still scupper talks
EU seeks agreement on migration proposal at high-level conferenceEuropean lawmakers and stakeholders met in Brussels on Thursday to discuss migration, as the bloc seeks consensus on one of its most divisive issues.
Coronavirus: Mexico becomes 4th country to hit 100,000 COVID-19 deathsWith only 2.5 million tests carried out in a country of 130 million, the pandemic is taking a psychological toll on Mexicans who face a struggle to encourage people to take precautions against the virus.
Danish Prime Minister picks new minister after mink culling scandal
Pompeo becomes first top US diplomat to visit an Israeli settlement
Plane with first doses of CoronaVac vaccine lands in BrazilBrazil has received its first batch of the Chinese-made CoronaVac vaccine despite a political and diplomatic row over whether to use it.
Joe Biden's election offers lessons for Europe on how to deal with far-right populism ǀ View
Hong Kong students chant pro-democracy slogans in rare act of defianceA new national security law has all but wiped out the mass democracy protests that rocked the city last year and has left swathes of the population too scared to speak out.
'We won't give up': Weber defiant over veto of EU's €1.8tr budget deal
Spain divides opinion with strategy to combat online disinformation
Morawiecki and Orbán step up attacks on EU over rule of law debate
The UK’s Green Revolution plan is ‘nowhere near enough’, say criticsBoris Johnson's new climate pledge is worth £12 billion, but does it go far enough?
Danish agriculture minister resigns over illegal order to cull mink
UK unveils £12 billion plan to create a Green Industrial Revolution
G20 COVID-19 recovery packages risk reversing climate gains: report
Duma backs bill protecting Putin and family from prosecutionThe bill would mean presidents who were no longer in office and members of their family "cannot be brought to criminal or administrative responsibility, as well as detained, arrested, subjected to a search, interrogation, or body search."
Trump fires agency head who vouched for 2020 vote securityHours before being dismissed, Krebs tweeted out a report citing 59 election security experts saying there is no credible evidence of computer fraud in the 2020 election outcome.
Ex-Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn reinstated to UK opposition partyCorbyn was suspended in October after stating that allegations of antisemitism in the party were "dramatically overstated".
Western Sahara: Who are the Polisario Front and what do they want?
Professor Klaus Schwab believes a 'global reset' is possible
Bulgarian national radio chief hits out against political interferenceHe told Euronews he was disgruntled by the "lipservice" he said the government paid to enacting real change in a country that has been labelled "the black sheep of the European Union" by Reporters Without Borders.
MEP ends hunger strike but won't give up on financial transactions tax
Head of US government agency under pressure to let transition proceedThe head of the little-known General Services Administration has yet to certify Biden as the winner, stalling the launch of the official transition process.
Calls mount on Armenian prime minister Nikol Pashinyan to resign
Belarus: After 100 days, Lukashenko is still in power. Now what?
European researchers find new ways to present migrant data
Researchers find new ways to avoid misconceptions using migrant data
Germany indicts suspected Egyptian spy in Angela Merkel's press team
Nationalist parties lose key cities in Bosnia's municipal elections
Moldova: Sandu is president, but the battle for power has only begun
Hungary and Poland block EU's COVID recovery package over rule of law
‘Hungry for solutions’: Climate festival fills gap left by COP26Across two days, over 100 speakers will be giving talks and panels featuring solutions to the climate crisis.
EU must reform to act faster in 'geopolitical world', Belgium PM saysBelgian PM Alexander De Croo says Europe needs to 'play its role in a much faster way', in a nod to calls to remove the member state veto in foreign policy
Irish FM says EU and UK have to make 'big progress' ahead of deadline
Belarus: More than 1,000 arrested in fresh protest, NGO says
'I concede nothing': Trump says Biden 'won' election, vows to fight onTrump tweeted that “He won” but said the Democrat's victory was only “in the eyes” of the media.
Turkey's Erdogan visits North Cyprus and calls for two island statesThe Turkish president's comments came during a controversial visit to the north of the island, occupied by Turkey since 1974 and not recognised internationally.
Fearing voter fraud, Moldova war veterans keep an eye on Transnistria
Moldova: How the diaspora keeps Europe's poorest nation afloat
Coronavirus: 60% of French admit flouting at least one lockdown rule
Pressure mounts on Peru's President Merino after two die in protestsAngry Peruvians have taken to the streets in daily demonstrations accusing Congress of staging a parliamentary coup putting Manuel Merino in power.
Thousands rally outside Georgia's parliament in protest at electionThe ruling Georgian Dream party, led by the nation's richest man, narrowly won the October 31 parliamentary vote that opposition parties say was rigged.
Clashes in Washington after Trump supporters rally in election protest
Egypt discovers 2,500-year-old tomb containing at least 100 mummiesIt the latest in a series of discoveries in the same area of the country south of the capital, Cairo.
Avni Doshi: 'surreal' experience of Booker Prize shortlist
Analysis: Biden victory signals change not just in US, but Europe tooWhat does Joe Biden's victory mean for Europe and the future of Trump-style politics across the globe?
EU 'unlikely' to give UK more time to adjust after Brexit transition
Moldova votes: Will pro-EU candidate Sandu oust Putin's pick Dodon?
EU condemns death of Belarusian artist after police arrest
Romania’s coal heartland embraces Green New DealRomania's industrial Jiu Valley has been tied to fluctuations in the fortunes of coal for a century and a half. But soon the coal will be gone. Is the EU's help to make the transition going to be enough to provide a worthwhile and sutainable future for its residents?
'There is no such thing as green coal' - Bankwatch Romania
US election security officials reject Trump claims of widespread fraud
Orban's new laws a distraction from real problems, says MEP
EU urges Croatia to cooperate amid migrant abuse claims at border
The briefing: Why Sweden’s coronavirus approach has failed
Bulgaria's putting brakes on North Macedonia's EU dream. Here's why.
Debunked: Dead voters’ ballots not evidence of major election fraud
Barroso: it would be 'absurd' if there is no EU-UK Brexit Deal
Will Trump's defeat dent the ambitions of authoritarian leaders?
‘Informational chaos’: Proposals made to regulate social media"Lies laced with anger and hate spread faster and further than the boring facts of news," says the Forum on Information & Democracy, which has laid out 250 ways social media companies can be regulated to tackle a growing threat to democracy.
Here's your boiled down guide to global tea traditions
Biden chooses longtime adviser Ron Klain as chief of staffKlain served as chief of staff for Biden during Barack Obama’s first term, was chief of staff to Vice President Al Gore in the mid-1990s and was a key adviser on the Biden campaign, guiding Biden’s debate preparations and coronavirus response.
Armenian PM defends Nagorno-Karabakh truce amid protests in Yerevan
Watch: Boris Johnson faces Keir Starmer at PMQs
Hungary proposes draft law to ban adoption for same-sex couples
Biden: Trump's refusal to concede is 'embarrassing' mark on his legacy
US election crime prosecutor quits over order to probe alleged fraud
Falkland Islands to be completely cleared of mines 38 years after war
Lithuania to support 'those who fight for freedom' in Taiwan
Biden defends Obamacare as US Supreme Court considers its merits
Brazil halts trials of Chinese-made vaccine due to 'serious event'
EU agrees on tighter rules for surveillance tech exportsUnder the new rules, European companies will have to apply for government licenses to export certain products and they'll have to meet criteria that have been beefed up to include requirements to consider whether the sale poses a risk to human rights.
Biden win strengthens EU's hand in post-Brexit trade talks, says Weber
Ukraine's president tests positive for COVID-19
Estonia's far-right minister resigns over Biden remarks
Ex-Kosovo president Thaci to appear in court on war crimes charges
Trebek remembered for grace that elevated him above TV host“Jeopardy!" host Alex Trebek has died at the age of 80.
Bush congratulates Biden as Republicans silent on election outcome
Belarus detains at least 400 as anti-Lukashenko protests continue
Thai protesters defy police water cannons to deliver lettersThe pro-democracy movement has been pushing a bold challenge to reform the country's monarchy with almost daily demonstrations.
'This isn't over!': Donald Trump's supporters refuse to accept defeatAt protests in cities across the US, Trump supporters railed against the news that Joe Biden is the President-elect, chanting "This isn’t over! This isn’t over!" and "Fake news!"
Kamala Harris becomes first black woman, South Asian elected VP
Biden transition team didn't wait for verdict to get busyWell before Saturday's victory for Joe Biden, longtime aide Ted Kaufman had been leading efforts to ensure the former US vice president can begin building out a government in anticipation of a victory.
Castex says France to continue to fight 'enemy' of 'radical Islamism'
Donald Trump's chief of staff Mark Meadows diagnosed with coronavirus
Estonia's liberal reputation at stake in gay marriage referendum
El Gouna Film Festival supports MENA films during global pandemic
Why has the Arizona vote led to different vote counts for Joe Biden?
Europe's week: US elections test both American and European unity
How US election misinformation has led to real-world tensions
Trump may run again in 2024 if he loses this year, says former aide
Alejandro Agag: tearing up the motorsport rulebook
The Briefing: Poland abortion ruling should worry everyone in the EU
What is secularism and why is it causing such divisions in France?
Deal reached to link EU funding to respect for rule of law
Trump 'does not have the authority to interfere' US election vote
Attempts to undermine public trust tarnished US election, says OSCE
Kosovo's president Hashim Thaçi resigns to face war crimes charges
How a Jewish writer lived, loved and survived in WW2-era Romania
US pulls out of Paris Climate Agreement: What happens next?
Five things you may have missed from the US election
US election: Which states do Biden and Trump need to win?
From peace prize to civil war in a year? Ethiopia PM sends in military
Who would Europeans vote for if the US election took place in Europe?
Hungary's foreign minister tests positive for coronavirus in ThailandOnly Peter Szijjarto tested positive and will be flown home alone. The rest of the Hungarian delegation will be flown back in a separate aircraft.
Tech giants give insight into how US election is being fought online
Donald Trump: The man behind the MAGA swagger
These eight crucial swing states will decide if Trump or Biden wins
US election: What is the electoral college and how does it work?
What will a Biden or Trump win mean for the European Union?
Trump and Biden: How do they differ on tackling the climate crisis?
Biden's small drive-in rallies contrast with Trump's large crowdsBiden has stuck to socially distanced gatherings with small crowds segregated in their cars right up to the last moment -- in contrast to Trump's large rallies where few supporters bother with masks.
Donald Trump's sudden entry into politics and ascent to the presidency
How COVID-19 influenced the race for the White House in 2020
Joe Biden: Safe, steady and shaped by tragedy
Trump support struggling with women as election loomsPolls suggest that the key female demographic is deserting Donald Trump in significant enough numbers to influence the outcome of the election. His support is particularly weak amongst middle class females, who helped him win in 2016.
US election: What are five big issues that Americans care about?
Why don't more countries follow Estonia and hold elections online?Only one country in the world has implemented an online voting system for its entire electorate: Estonia.
Georgia set for more protests amid claims of vote-rigging in election
What has French president Macron said to outrage the Muslim world?
Poland: Eleventh day of anti-government, pro-abortion protests
How will a Trump or Biden presidency affect defence issues in Europe?
Belarus: Police break up crowds amid latest anti-Lukashenko protests
Moldova presidential election has Sandu ahead of Dodon in first round
Hong Kong: Seven pro-democracy lawmakers arrested
Why Nemonte Nenquimo has become the voice of the Indigenous populationNenquimo has been named one of Time Magazine's Most Influential People of 2020.
Georgia's ruling party wins parliamentary vote, opposition cries foul
Film about Bosnia takes top prize at El Gouna Film Festival
Crowds celebrate Pride in virus-free TaiwanTens of thousands of revellers join a gay pride rally made possible by the island's successful vanquishing of the coronavirus.
US election: What are the Senate races to look out for?
How Transnistria could help win Moldova's election for Igor DodonIt declared independence from Moldova in 1992. But almost 30 years on, this tiny breakaway republic is set to have an outsized impact on Moldova's election.
US election: Here's how it can impact Europeans' livesThe US presidential vote comes amid a series of political and diplomatic skirmishes, ranging from Brexit to Nato’s role. But, beyond the intangible layer of geopolitics, what has been the real impact on the average European citizen by Trump’s presidency?
Poland's highest court has legalised the torture of women. We will fight back for our rights ǀ View
Why Georgia's elections could be make or break for its democracy
Watch: Thousands of demonstrators protest Poland's near abortion ban
Circular Economy, Pitch Up In The Sky and getting ready for ChristmasOn Euronews' Business Line this month, the Belgian cooperative that transforms waste into desirable designer products, the Dubai event taking elevator pitches to new heights. Plus, the toy companies looking for Christmas salvation.
David Miliband: If Biden wins, Europe needs to make itself an indispensable partner abroad ǀ ViewIf Joe Biden wins the US presidency on November 3, he is going to have his hands full at home. As well as working with the US on domestic goals, Europe needs to learn to make itself an indispensable partner abroad to tackle global problems.
This is how ‘inclusive’ art & artifacts are keeping museums relevantIn the spirit of inclusion and appealing to as broad an audience as possible, once rarely seen and sacred artifacts, are now accessible to many in museums and galleries around the world.
¨Protest-hit Belarus closes all borders except its one with Russia
Romania's deadly nightclub blaze is still an open wound five years on
Mass military wedding in Taiwan includes two same-sex couplesWaving rainbow flags and shedding tears of joy, two Taiwanese same-sex couples tied the knot on Friday at a mass wedding hosted by the military.
Donald Trump: the 45th US President - and only third to be impeachedDonald Trump became only the third US President in the nation's history to face impeachment. How did he get there and what was the outcome? A Euronews guide.
Czech Republic has its third health minister in just six weeks
Moldova elections: Everything you need to know
Idriss B - the artist causing a stir on Dubai's streets
Ex-leader Jeremy Corbyn suspended amid damning anti-Semitism reportIt comes after an investigation slammed the Labour Party over its response to allegations of anti-Semitism within its ranks.
Czech demonstrators say government measures are 'impoverishing nation'
Georgia’s potential at risk because of creeping Russian influence and private interests ǀ View
Will young green voters swing the US election?
CEOs of Facebook, Google and Twitter grilled on content moderation
Will Janez Janša take Slovenia down the same populist road as Hungary?
Poland deploys riot police as pro-abortion protests spread
EU rings in stock listing of 'social bond' with resounding successThe EU wanted to raise 17 billion euros on capital markets to fund its short term employment scheme known as SURE. It's first test went above and beyond expectations.
Nurses with COVID-19 asked to carry on working at Belgian hospital
Row as Polish leader says 'defend churches' from pro-abortion protests"We must defend Polish churches, we must defend them at every price," Jaroslaw Kaczynski said, drawing condemnation from the opposition who accused him of "inciting civil war."
US election: Biden vows to unify and save country; Trump hits MidwestWith under a week to go until the vote, the Democratic challenger was in Georgia while the president is on a whistlestop tour of several Midwestern states.
Islamophobia or satire? Plantu on France's caricature controversySatirical cartoons have a long and colourful tradition in France that dates back to the Middle Ages, but in recent years they have inspired controversy – and horrific acts of violence such as the attacks against Charlie Hebdo in 2015. Nevertheless, cartoonist Jean Plantu says debate will win.
'Moldova is at a crossroads' - Maia Sandu
Launching new businesses via the EU's Erasmus for Young EntrepreneursNew and experienced entrepreneurs are being matched up via the Erasmus for Young Entrepreneurs programme (EYE); this EU-funded cross-border initiative teams people up, encourages innovation and allows both sides to explore new markets.
Summer of protests shaping voters' attitudes to US election
Thailand: Protesters call on Germany to probe king over Bavaria visits
COVID-19: Protests in Italy over new pandemic crackdown turn violent
Amy Coney Barrett confirmed to US Supreme Court by divided Senate
Influence of protests and armed groups on US election campaignSome commentators believe the violent activities of armed miltia groups is influencing the US election campaign. There have been a series of incidents connected with these groups, despite their lack of a connection to actual law enforcement.
Angela Merkel is reportedly considering a nationwide 'lockdown light'
More pressure on UK government over meals for disadvantaged children
US election: What do opinion polls say about the presidential race?
Will Belarus' political crisis kill off its booming IT sector?
Belarus: Workers go on strike as Lukashenko ignores call to resign
Germany's CDU party delays electing Merkel's successor for second time
How to enjoy Switzerland's iconic ski resort, Verbier 'off season'
Bulgaria PM positive for COVID-19 as protests against him continue
US elections: Why American voters are more divided than everAny presidential election in the United States America is bound to divide Americans, but it seems like the country is more divided than ever. And getting there has taken years. But how did it happen? And how does America get out of it?
US-Poland: Trump brings Polish and American nations closer
US election: Trump to escalate campaign as Biden targets key statesDonald Trump is expected to hit nearly a dozen states in the final week of campaigning as he tries to recover ground from his Democratic rival.
Belarusian opposition leader Tikhanouskaya calls for nationwide strike
'Moldova is at a crossroads,' says leader of opposition Maia Sandu
Ukraine votes: Local elections prove setback for Volodymyr Zelenskyy
Lithuania centre-right wins second round of legislative elections
COVID-19: Anger in Italy as bars and restaurants forced to shut early
Libya's rival factions sign 'permanent' ceasefire after UN talks
French MP Laetitia Avia says more action is needed on online hate
Climate activists struggle to stay relevant during COVID-19 pandemicThe environmental organisation Fridays for Future Italia told Euronews about campaigning during the pandemic and why the climate and coronavirus crises are intrinsically linked.
QAnon: a dangerous conspiracy boosted by the COVID-19 pandemic
Europe's week: Green deal vs coronavirus recovery
Greek police search for convicted former Golden Dawn lawmaker
Could former prime minister Saad Hariri reverse Lebanon's fortunes?
Navalny: Putin 'intervened' to allow critic's evacuation to GermanyThe Russian president said he asked the country's Prosecutor General to immediately allow opposition figure Alexei Navalny to be moved to Germany for urgent treatment.
The Briefing: Fishing latest issue to get caught up in Brexit’s net
Denmark's dilemma as North Sea oil tests its green credentialsDenmark leads the way in Europe when it comes to climate-friendly policies. But lucrative North Sea oil is testing its green credentials.
Poland protesters tussle with police after abortion ruling
Former PM Saad Hariri asked to form Lebanon's next government
Sakharov Prize: Belarus' opposition wins EU human rights award
Thailand cancels emergency decree in bid to calm protests
Ugly fruit, roaming bears, and halting wildfires: meet the EU LIFE Award 2020 winnersLoving ugly fruit, helping roaming bears, and halting Hungarian wildfires: meet the winners of the EU's LIFE Awards 2020
Macron to continue 'fight for freedom' in tribute to beheaded teacher
EU's LIFE Awards recognise best projects for environment and sustainability
Spanish MPs vote down Vox party's no-confidence motion in PM SanchezVox wanted Sanchez’s government out for what the far-right party says is the poor handling of the coronavirus pandemic, among other claims.
How close are we to finding a coronavirus vaccine?
Why is environmentalism more popular in LGBTQ+ communities?
Barack Obama to hold first in-person event for candidate Joe Biden
'We know what needs to done': Macron promises radical Islam crackdown
Buying EU citizenship: Golden passports and visas explainedThe EU is taking action against two member states, Cyprus and Malta, over their investor citizenship schemes - here's what they are, and why the EU has a problem with them.
Manchester put on strictest COVID-19 restrictions amid row with London
EU begin legal action against Malta & Cyprus over 'golden passports'
Millennials particularly disillusioned about democracy, report finds55% of millennials say they are dissatisfied with democracy, while less than half of Generation X and baby boomers felt the same way at that age.
Polish court to determine fate of 'independent' human rights ombudsmanSince the populist party, Law and Justice, won power in 2015, it has taken control of almost all state institutions, except the Human Rights Commissioner's office but that could soon change.
'Running Angry': Trump attacks health officials, press and pollsUS President Donald Trump said he was "running angry" and "happy" as he travels around the country in a last-minute push to turn around his campaign.
Six Russian intelligence officers indicted by U.S. over hacking
Ex-boss of Basque separatist militant group ETA apologises for deathsJosu Urrutikoetxea led ETA during one of its bloodiest periods when its victims included children bombed to death while sleeping in a Zaragoza police compound
Copenhagen mayor resigns over sexual harassment claims
Clashes erupt during protests anniversary in ChileClashes erupted between some protesters and police as thousands of people on Sunday demonstrated in Santiago to mark the anniversary of the movement that led to massive protests in 2019.
French minister keen to disband Islamic NGOs after teacher's beheading
The 18-year-old activist changing the climate conversation in the UK
The UN’s 21-year-old climate advisor: Who is Nathan Méténier?"We are being listened to but not heard."
The troubled lives of Catalan presidents are an echo of Catalonia’s troubles within Spain ǀ View
Anuna de Wever on fighting climate change and ‘incapable’ politicians"I want to have an impact in the biggest way possible."
Anti-government rallies held across Belarus despite regime threats
Dozens gather in Prague for outdoor Catholic massDozens of people gathered in Prague's Old Town Square on Sunday for an outdoor Catholic mass, due to coronavirus rules limiting numbers allowed inside.
Emmanuel Macron must give Muslims the same free speech protections as other communities ǀ ViewThose committed to the freedom of speech should remember that it comes with conditions to ensure its survival. It is not unbridled; it comes with protections which must apply to all communities.
Protesters take to streets of Bangkok despite government warning
Thai protesters back on Bangkok's streets in defiance of police
The Briefing: EU governments in impossible situation with COVID spike
Bulgaria protests enter 100th day as protesters denounce corruption
Demonstrations throughout France in tribute to beheaded teacherPeople across France took to the streets on Sunday to march in tribute to Samuel Paty, who was murdered after showing his students caricatures of Mohammad.
Europe's week: Leaders face tough virus decisions amid second wave
The entrepreneurial exchange that builds business success
Explained: Social networks face backlash over misinformation methods
Daphne Caruana Galizia: The fight for truth continues three years onInvestigative journalist Daphne Caruana Galizia was killed when a bomb planted in her car detonated. The fight to uncover the truth behind her murder and closure for her family continues to shake Malta to its foundations.
France: Sarkozy charged with conspiracy over alleged Libyan funding
Pfizer hopes to seek approval for its COVID-19 vaccine in mid-November
Turkey is 'more assertive' on the world stage but also 'more isolated'
YouTube bans conspiracy theories that justify real-world violence
EU Summit: Decision on reducing carbon emissions pushed back
Brexit trade talks: Key terms explained
Brexit: Will battle for control of fishing rights torpedo trade deal?
UK surprise after EU takes intensity out of post-Brexit trade talks
Police search homes of top French officials in COVID-19 probeAmong those to be targeted were ex-prime minister Edouard Philippe and health minister Olivier Veran.
Kyrgyzstan: President resigns amid protests over election resultsThe embattled president is the third to be toppled by popular uprisings in the former Soviet country since 2005.
EU's priorities in Africa should be the same as in Europe, says MEP
Little optimism over post-Brexit trade deal as EU gears up for summit
Can the state subsidy row blocking a EU-UK trade deal be resolved?
Denis Mukwege's stand against sexual violence in DRCDenis Mukwege, known to some as Dr Miracle, explains to Euronews the impact of COVID-19 on the ongoing efforts to help women victims of sexual violence in the Democratic Republic of Congo.
Watch: MEPs debate impact of COVID-19 second wave in EuropeAre we making the same mistakes as we did during the 1st wave?
Are we getting the balance right between protecting lives and livelihoods? 
Watch our debate from the EU Parliament on the #COVID19 2nd wave.
Leader of neo-Nazi Golden Dawn party sentenced to 13 years prison
Facebook to ban paid anti-vax ads but not posts
Israel and Lebanon start talks to settle maritime border disputeThe two neighbours both claim 860 square kilometres of the Mediterranean Sea as being within their own exclusive economic zone.
WTO says EU can put tariffs on $4 billion of US goods
China and Russia win seats on UN rights council while Saudis loseRussia and Cuba were running unopposed, but China and Saudi Arabia were in a five-way race in the only contested race for seats on the Human Rights Council.
European trade unions accuse Amazon of spying on workers
Russia’s war for influence in Lithuania is waged with TV and baseball
People are fed up with ‘eco-friendly tips’, says new climate study
Slovakia far right leader jailed for four years over Nazi symbolsPeople’s Party Our Slovakia, whose members use Nazi salutes and want Slovakia out of the European Union and NATO, was the fourth-most popular party in the country in February’s parliamentary elections.
Belarus: Protests continue after mass arrests and live-fire threats
High voltage reaches the Cyclades Islands in a boost for tourism and the environment
"More islands of the Cyclades will be interconnected in the future"Cyclades in Greek means cercle. These islands are not more alone but relied in terms of electricity. A long term project that Ioannis Margaris, form IPTO knows well. He stresses here its challenges and future goals.
US Senate to press on with hearings for Trump Supreme Court nomineeThe US Senate will begin confirmation hearings for Donald Trump's nominee to the Supreme Court, a mere three weeks before the presidential election.
Lithuania votes: Centre-right opposition edges towards win
Police violently disperse demonstrators at Belarus protest marchBlack-clad masked police violently disperse protesters and make arrests at the latest opposition march in Minsk against the re-election of Belarus's strongman leader Lukashenko.
Dozens arrested in Belarus as police break up anti-Lukashenko protests
Ivory Coast opposition defy president’s 3rd term bidThe political opposition in Ivory Coast presented a united front against the reelection of Alassane Ouattara, at a rally of about 30,000 people.
Belarus' authoritarian leader visits his foes in prison
Kyrgyz parliament appoints new PM as troops are deployed in BishkekSadyr Zhaparov is declared prime minister after authorities announce a state of emergency and a nightly curfew following a week of unrest in Kyrgyzstan's capital
Trump not a COVID-19 transmission risk to others, his doctor says
Belarus: Britain is 8th European country to recall ambassador
Calls to exclude convicted far-right MEP from European Parliament
How COVID-19 could save Lithuania's populists from electoral oblivion
“We are women. We are strong.” - Belarusian opposition leader promises to fight until victory
Portraits of Spain's king burned amid protests at his Barcelona visit
Spanish police enforce Madrid state of emergency travel restrictions
Belarusian opposition figure unfazed by Russian arrest warrantSviatlana Tsikhanouskaya, the Belarusian opposition figurehead who is currently in exile, told Euronews she is not frightened about being placed on Russia’s wanted list.
Portugal believes in justice and transparency. Europe does too | View
Serbia has rolled out the red carpet to China - but at what cost?
Spanish government wants to repeal parental consent rule for abortions
Poland fines Russian energy giant Gazprom €6.5bn over Nord Stream 2
Move over, Sanna! Girl, 16, becomes Finland's prime minister for a dayA 16-year-old girl assumed the position of prime minister in Finland on Wednesday, in a scheme celebrating the UN’s International Day of the Girl.
Pence-Harris: Five key takeaways from the vice-presidential debate
Mike Pence clashes with Kamala Harris over coronavirus at VP debate
Reopening occupied Cypriot ghost town 'complicates reunification'Varosha, which used to be a tourist hotspot, has been fenced off and abandoned since Turkey invaded northern Cyprus after a Greek-inspired coup in 1974.
Why did it take so long to form Belgium's new 'Vivaldi' coalition?The alliance of parties from four distinct political backgrounds, nicknamed after the famous composer's "Four Seasons", follows 653 days of temporary arrangements.
Watch: Azerbaijan & Armenia leaders speak exclusively to Euronews
Blame game as Azerbaijani and Armenian leaders speak to EuronewsArmenia's Nikol Pashinyan and Ilham Aliyev of Azerbaijan discussed the flare-up in violence in Nagorno-Karabakh during exclusive interviews with Euronews.
Has devolution in the UK complicated its response to COVID-19 crisis?
New EU framework 'will not solve' plight of Roma people, says activist
'Intergalactic incompetence': UK PM slammed over missing COVID results
Poland's culture war: LGBT people forced to turn to civil disobedience
Brexit uncertainty leaves EU citizens considering their UK futures
Will the €4bn Belgrade-Budapest rail upgrade be a benefit or burden?Without effective rail connections from Belgrade to Greece, “this railway will go from nowhere to nowhere,” says Laszlo Varju, an MP for the centre-left Democratic Coalition party.
Golden Dawn verdict: Leader of Greek neo-Nazi party convicted
No recovery fund without rule of law conditions, says Manfred Weber
Every UK home to be powered by offshore wind power by 2030, says UK PM
Refugee-led organisations are critical to the fight against COVID-19 ǀ ViewThe COVID-19 pandemic presents a unique challenge but also a major opportunity to highlight how refugee-led organisations are best placed to act both in emergencies and on long-term integration strategies.
EU court rules against Hungary's Viktor Orban over Soros university
Ireland tightens COVID-19 restrictions in attempt to avoid lockdown
'Don't be afraid,' Trump urges after leaving hospital
How Russia's soft media power is battling for Moldovan minds
Albania approves electoral code reform to boost EU prospects
Czech Republic is officially called Czechia. Why hasn't it caught on?
MEPs slam EU rule of law measures as 'ill-equipped and ineffective'
AfD falls from first to third place in eastern German states
COVID-19: Trump criticised for drive-by while infected with virus
Environmental racism has ‘ripped’ Black people away from nature
Belarus: 100,000 take to the streets to protest against LukashenkoProtesters gathered in central Minsk for the ninth consecutive Sunday rally against Belarusian President Alexander Lukashenko.
Pope Francis says COVID-19 has proved capitalism does not work
Baku demands Armenia withdraw as conflict rages in Nagorno-Karabakh
Czech Republic: Andrej Babis' party wins big in regional electionsThe elections were the first held in the Czech Republic during the coronavirus pandemic.
In London, confusion and scepticism over new COVID-19 rulesPubs and restaurants in the British capital must close no later than 10 pm and people cannot socialise of groups of more than six people.
French territory of New Caledonia prepares for independence referendumVoters are expected to reject breaking away from France's control after almost 170 years despite rising support for the move.
COVID-19 deniers emboldened in Bosnia even as nation counts its dead
EV Charge: Electric mobility accessible wherever and whoever you are!EV Charge: Electric mobility accessible wherever and whoever you are!
German reunification: Thirty years on, is the job done?Less than a year after the Berlin Wall came down, Germany was a united country again.
Italy: Far-right leader Salvini in court over migrant detention claimsSalvini is accused of abusing his powers as then-interior minister to block 116 migrants from disembarking from a coastguard boat last year, under his so-called "closed ports" policy.
European Commission widens its horizons in crackdown on corruption and abuse of lawThe issue of the rule of law has become a central issue in the European Union over the last decade. Up until recently, the spotlight was mainly on concerns over Hungary and Poland. But now the European Commission has decided to widen its horizons.
Mostar hasn't had a functioning government in 12 years. Here's why.A spat between the city's two ethno-nationalist parties - one Croat, one Bosniak - has created a political stalemate since 2008. The city's residents are paying the price.
Europe's week: A row over rule of law and fears over cultural sector
Belgium: New seven-party coalition government officially sworn in
Belarus announces retaliatory sanctions against the EUIt comes hours after Brussels slapped 40 Belarusian officials with sanctions over the falsification of the August 9 presidential election and the crackdown on peaceful protesters
Belarus: EU agrees sanctions on 40 officials but not Lukashenko"There will be no immunity for those who are responsible for the crackdown on demonstrators and opposition politicians," Ursula von der Leyen said.
President Trump is 'feeling well' as speculation mounts over condition
EU giving dialogue with Turkey 'a chance' but warns of sanctionsCommission chief Ursula von der Leyen warned that the bloc has a "tool box" of restrictive measures that be applied "immediately" if Ankara doesn't engage in "constructive" dialogue over underwater drilling.
In a divided Moldova, President Igor Dodon fights for four more years
Jews in Europe face new restrictions on religious freedom, says rabbi
EU Brexit infringement case: What is it and should the UK be worried?
Sign up to Euronews' newsletter on European politics
Madrid clashes with central government over tougher COVID restrictions
Kremlin critic Navalny says 'Putin was behind' poisoning
EU launches legal action against UK over controversial Brexit bill
US debate commission to make changes to format after Trump-Biden clash
Polish Cabinet reshuffle: Kaczynski joins as deputy prime minister
Will Belgium's new government delays push the country to split?Today (Wednesday), after nearly 500 days of intensive negotiations, the programme for a government led by Flemish liberal Alexander De Croo was finalised.
EU 'naive' over rule of law of breaches, says Jourova
Why are Armenian and Azerbaijani forces clashing in Nagorno-Karabakh?
First US presidential debate: Trump and Biden lock horns from outset
Kosovo war crimes probe: What you need to know
UK and Canada impose sanctions on Belarus leader Alexander Lukashenko
Nagorno-Karabakh: Dozens killed as flare-up intensifies on third dayThe official death toll stands at 95, including civilians, as the fighting between Armenia and Azerbaijan continues.
Chinese app TikTok opens up in Australia in bid to fight mistrustThe app, owned by ByteDance, a private Chinese company, has come under scrutiny in Australia after Donald Trump announced plans for a possible ban in the United States.
Putin denounces 'pressure' on Belarus as Macron calls for mediation
Mayor elected in Romania despite dying of COVID-19 a week earlierIn Sunday's local elections Ion Aliman won a landslide victory in Deveselu, Romania, despite having died the week before.
Belarus opposition activists nominated for EU human rights prizeThe Sakharov Prize for Freedom of Thought, first inaugurated in 1988, honours people or groups who defend human rights around the globe.
Chinese artist Ai Weiwei holds protest against Assange extraditionWeiwei claimed that the treatment of Assange bore similarities to the way Chinese authorities suppress dissidents.
Brexit trade talks: How badly do Europe's exporters need a deal?Many major European exporters to Britain have sounded cries of alarm on the urgent need for a new post-Brexit free trade agreement.
Town in former East Germany offers to take in 75 migrants
Macron criticises Lebanese leaders' 'betrayal' after PM steps downFrench President Emmanuel Macron said he was "ashamed" of Lebanese leaders after they failed to reform the government.
Swiss voters reject proposal to end EU freedom of movement
French Senate elections: Right and centre parties maintain majority
Belarus protests: 50th day of protests marked by 500 arrests
Belarus warns UN sanctions would bring 'chaos and anarchy'Makei's speech was played hours after the latest in a series of large protests in Belarus over the Aug. 9 re-election of President Alexander Lukashenko.
Kosovo specialist prosecutor arrests another war veterans official
European Union’s proposed new migration pact generates dissatisfaction on all sidesIn frontier nations there’s worry over the administrative burden. Those involved in rescue missions in the Mediterranean that there are no new funds to patrol the sea.  And among politicians who want to block migration, there’s concern that refugee cases should be dealt with outside the Union.
Lebanese prime minister-designate resigns after reform failsLebanon faces the dual challenge of reforming its government and rebuilding after a deadly explosion destroyed large parts of its capital city.
US President Trump nominates anti-abortion judge to Supreme CourtAmy Coney Barrett has described abortion as "always immoral". The Republican-dominated Senate is planning to confirm her and the Democrats are powerless to stop it.
Russia, China blocking report into Libya arms embargo violationsThe report accuses states including the UAE, Turkey, Jordan and Russia of funding rebel forces in defiance of the UN
Trans people still face discrimination in Belgium, claims activist"I still hear a lot of people are losing their jobs, or can't rent a home, or can't buy a home if the landlord or the boss gets to know they're trans," said Aiden de Prins.
Belarus should be 'warning for Moldova' ahead of presidential election
Ruth Bader Ginsburg becomes first woman to lie in state at US CapitolRuth Bader Ginsburg is the first woman to lie in state at the US Capitol. Rosa Parks was the first woman to lie in honour at the Capitol, a tribute for non governmental figures.
Local NGOs rally to rebuild Beirut in wake of port explosion
Navalny poisoning leaves Nord Stream 2 pipeline's fate in the balance
Will the Swiss vote to drop the guillotine on EU freedom of movement?
First Kosovar Albanian arrested on war crimes charges
Cartoon contest bids to highlight perils of political satire in EuropeThe international contest brought cartoonists from 44 countries together in a celebration of the freedom of expression.
Lukashenko was 'afraid of the West', says former campaign managerAlexander Feduta worked in Lukashenko’s campaign office back in 1994 and helped to get Lukashenko elected as the new Belarusian president. Looking back, Lukashenko already had some of the traits seen later in his presidency, but they have become more profound, he says.
‘Down with Satire!’ How our right to freedom of expression is being eroded ǀ ViewFreedom of expression - through satire, cartoons and so on - is being eroded by self-censorship. Despite it being a fundamental cornerstone of European culture, we are becoming afraid to be irreverent.
'No democratic legitimacy': EU slams Lukashenko's 'inauguration'
US election: Trump won't commit to peaceful transfer of power
Marseille and Paris hit out over tightening of COVID-19 restrictions
Belarus: Water cannons deployed to disperse protesters in MinskMore than 150 people were arrested in demonstrations across Belarus on Wednesday following the secret inauguration of President Alexander Lukashenko, according to a monitoring group.
Polish government vows to end deadlock in coalition power struggleDissent by the small United Poland party prompted its larger partner Law and Justice (PiS) to warn that the ruling coalition was crumbling.
COVID-19: UK Johnson under pressure to extend jobs retention scheme
Romania: Judicial reforms 'contrary to EU law' — ECJ legal advice
New EU migration pact aims to increase member state contributions
Coronavirus: Death toll from COVID-19 exceeds 200,000 in USThe US has recorded the highest number of coronavirus deaths and infections in the world, followed by Brazil and India.
Is social media fuelling the spread of climate change misinformation?
Bulgaria: Independence Day protesters urge PM Borissov to resign
Romanian border police accused of alleged violence against migrants
Czech Republic appoints new health minister amid COVID-19 spike
UN chief warns over threat of new Cold War between US and ChinaIt came as Donald Trump used the virtual UN meeting to attack China over the emergence of coronavirus. China hit back at what it called "a political virus" and said Trump's accusations were "baseless".
Why has Donald Trump become the new symbol of the German far-right?What's the connection between conspiracy theorists and Populism? Who are the 'Reichsbürger'? And what has Donald Trump got to do with any of it?
Turkey tensions should be taken to Hague - Cyprus' Foreign MinisterCyprus has called for sanctions against Turkey over illegal drilling in the Eastern Mediterranean, but is offering a legal alternative.
'Bring eggs and tomatoes' say Bulgaria anti-government demo organisers
Forty years after the war, how are Iranian and Iraqi relations?Tehran now wields considerable political and economic influence in neighbouring Iraq with some Iraqis deploring that their country was "handed over to Iran".
US Supreme Court: Barrett favourite as Trump moves to fill RBG postThe US President says he expects to decide by the weekend on a Supreme Court replacement for Ruth Bader Ginsburg, ignoring Democratic objections.
Serbia’s Muslim enclave fears new ethnic violence
On a mission to save our soils - the EU's plan to rebuild the landRebuilding the degraded soils of Europe is one of the EU's missions within the new Horizon Europe framework, about to be launched. Euronews' Claudio Rosmino for Futuris investigates how new practices are rolling back years of ecological damage.
What are cover crops? The role of protective growthIn recent decades, the need for a crop that covers fallow land to protect it from soil erosion and other issues has been recognised. Futuris explains how cover crops work.
Biden urges Senators to follow their conscience on US Supreme Court Justice
Belarus: Tsikhanouskaya tells EU to be 'brave' over sanctions
Belarus: Tens of thousands protest in face of police repression
Photographer Peter Turnley shows the human face of New York's lockdown
NGO blasts Italy's blockade of its migrant rescue ship as 'political'The vessel was detained in the port of Palermo for 11 hours for an inspection the NGO Seawatch International called "arbitrary."
Italian referendum on parliament size heading towards 'yes'Exit polls suggested a fairly resounding 'yes' vote won the day in the referendum with a projected share between 60-64%.
Belarus: More than 300 arrested at women's march in Minsk
Navalny: Kremlin critic recovers speech and movement after poisoningIn video posted on Instagram, Alexei Navalny, who was poisoned with Novichok, can be seen up and about and walking down stairs in the Berlin hospital where he is being treated.
Thai protesters hold ambitious rally for democratic reformsThe core demands of protesters have been fresh elections, a new constitution and an end to intimidation of political activists.
How the death of Ruth Bader Ginsburg could impact the US election
Peru president survives impeachment vote amid virus turmoilPresident Martín Vizcarra survived an impeachment vote Friday after opposition lawmakers failed to amass enough support to oust the leader.
The Netherlands must reduce carbon emissions by the end of the year, but can this be done?The Netherlands must reduce carbon emissions by the end of the year, but can this be done?
Poland coalition collapse: Anger over new law on halal and kosher meat
Poland: PiS ponders ruling alone as United Right coalition 'collapses'
Disunited Kingdom: Why Brexit makes Scottish independence more likely
US official accuses Hezbollah of storing ammonium nitrate in EuropeA senior US State Department official said Hezbollah stored chemicals that can be used to make explosives in several European countries.
Lithuania says its Belarus border is open despite Lukashenko claim
European nations ask Brazil for ‘real action’ on deforestation
Brexit: Johnson compromises with MPs to head off revolt over bill
Europe must act to counter 'COVID-19 fatigue': WHO
Trump sees mass COVID-19 vaccinations 'soon', contradicting expertsThe US President's claims fly in the face of evidence from health experts who say it could be months or longer before a vaccine is ready for mass distribution.
Experts cite 'crimes against humanity' in Maduro's VenezuelaThe experts say they delved into nearly 3,000 cases, looked at more than 5,000 killings and concluded that Maduro and his defence and interior ministers were aware of the crimes committed by Venezuelan security forces and intelligence agencies.
Airpnp: Polish activists cause a stink with toilet-sharing app stuntAn association in Poland has advertised a new app that purports to allow Warsaw residents to rent out their toilet for a fee — but there's a catch.
The 'anti-mask' movement: who are they and is one of them you?
Patagonia gets political with labels saying ‘vote the a**holes out’The outdoor brand is taking a stand against leaders who "disregard the climate crises and ignore science."
The EU needs urgent reform. A strong Europe doesn't exist without flourishing member states ǀ ViewThe EU cannot be found at offices in Brussels, Luxembourg or Strasbourg but rather in the history and in the spirit of the peoples of which it is composed. If Europe rejects its nations, she will lose her soul.
State of the Union: Key takeaways from Ursula von der Leyen's speech
A new Mideast? Israel signs pacts with Arab states Bahrain and UAE
Irish cabinet working from home over suspected COVID-19 infectionThe Dail or parliament was suspended in the afternoon over the announcement but resumed in the evening with junior ministers answering questions from lawmakers.
Belarusians flag their opposition to Lukashenko with defiant displays
US wildfires: Antifa misinformation continues to spread online
What can we expect in Von der Leyen's first state of the union speech?
Trump to preside over historic Arab-Israel recognition agreementsThe deals between Israel and Bahrain and the UAE could herald a dramatic shift in Middle East power dynamics, but they have been criticised for ignoring the Palestinians.
US wildfires: Trump dismisses science and predicts cooler temperatures
What was the Mayflower and why is it celebrated 400 years on?The pilgrims built a new life in Plymouth, Massachusets, in 1620. The area's original inhabitants paid a heavy price.
MEPs urge Brussels to link EU cash handouts to rule of law record
Russia to hand €1.2 billion loan to 'closest ally' Belarus, says Putin
Watch: EU summit with China 'frank and open', says Von der Leyen
Brexit: Is Boris Johnson justified in breaching international law?
EU climate plan leak suggests a 55% emissions cut by 2030
Any Putin intervention in Belarus will meet 'huge pushback'
Ukraine: Music's most extreme genre uses history to fight Russia
US wildfires spark political debate over climate change
Russia elections: Navalny allies claim symbolic wins in regional polls
What Lukashenko's meeting with Putin could mean for Belarus' future
US Open tennis: Dominic Thiem fightback earns first Grand Slam title
Israel to reimpose new nationwide lockdown as coronavirus cases surge
Belarus: Opposition protesters maintain pressure on Lukashenko
Meet the Belarusian protester, 73, who takes on riot police
Nazanin Zaghari-Ratcliffe's trial postponed in IranThe British-Iranian national, who has served four a half years of her a five-year sentence, faces new charges.
Russians vote in local elections in key test for ruling partyBefore being poisoned, Kremlin critic Alexei Navalny was urging Russians to vote tactically by casting their ballot for candidates best placed to defeat the ruling United Russia party.
Naomi Osaka comes back, beats Azarenka for 2nd US Open title
US wildfires death toll keeps climbing as smoke chokes West Coast
Effigy of Spanish king burned as tensions rise on Catalan National DaySupporters of Catalonia's secession from the rest of Spain gathered in small groups around the north east region on Friday under orders from event organisers to maintain social distancing amid a spike in coronavirus cases.
'Historic' Afghan-Taliban peace talks begin after decades of warThe peace talks could see the exit of American and NATO troops from Afghanistan after 19 years of conflict.
Putin apologises to Serbian leader over ministry spokeswoman's post
EU helps restart the economy after Covid-19 economic fallout
Lukashenko loyalists on why they back Belarus' embattled leader
Splinter-net? Is the internet fracturing along geopolitical lines?
A third of Kosovo believes coronarvirus is a hoax, according to pollThat is despite the country's healthcare system being at breaking point, with hospital beds filling up with COVID-19 cases and medicine reserves running low.
Lukashenko looks to "elder brother" Putin for support
Belarus: Unfinished Revolution
British are 'creating chaos deliberately' on Brexit, Coveney says
With power within reach, this is what Montenegro's new coalition government needs to do first ǀ ViewMontenegro's opposition is on the cusp on forging a historic coalition, ending nearly 30 years of rule by the country's Democratic Socialists. There is a lot on the agenda to turn the country around.
Abducted Kolesnikova 'told she was leaving Belarus dead or alive'
Med7 Summit: Leaders working to avert crisis between Turkey and Greece
Donald Trump admits to playing down dangers of coronavirus, book says
Montenegro’s future is in the EU, says its prime minister-in-waitingRussia's influence in Montenegro has been 'over-emphasised', according to the university professor who will likely be the Balkan country's next leader.
What are Trump's chances of winning the Nobel Peace Prize?
Stun grenades and rubber bullets: What it's like reporting on BelarusOne month on from the disputed August 9 election in Belarus, Emil Filtenborg tells Euronews how he expected some violence, but never anticipated it would be "this brutal, this early."
Estonia launches new visa programme for wealthy 'digital nomads'The Baltic country wants to attract wealthy tech entrepreneurs with a new one-year visa.
Iran announces new charge against detained Nazanin Zaghari-RatcliffeZaghari-Ratcliffe appeared Tuesday morning before a branch of the country’s Revolutionary Court in Tehran, where she was first sentenced to prison on murky espionage charges in 2017.
Last two Australian journalists leave China after 'harassment'
Is Europe heading for a K-shaped economic recovery?
Kolesnikova 'tore up passport at border' to avoid exile in Ukraine
'The regime is in agony': Belarus opposition leader slams Lukashenko
'How can UK be trusted?': ex-PM May slams Brexit plan to break treaty
A new exhibition in Rome looks at Banksy's early career
Trump supporters stage motorcade near Portland, OregonHundreds of Donald Trump supporters staged a car parade on Monday near Portland, where anti-racism protests have been going on for months
French PM Jean Castex tests negative after contact with COVID-19 caseCastex spent Saturday with Christian Prudhomme, the director of the Tour de France who has since tested positive for COVID-19. He will self-isolate for 7 days.
MEPs get back to workAs MEPs get back to work after a much needed summer, they describe what their priorities are for the coming months.
'If you leave the club there are consequences', EU's Michel warns UK
London 'must not play with peace in Ireland' during Brexit trade talks
It’s time the EU ended the cynical stalling game endangering lives in the Mediterranean ǀ View
Belarus: Maria Kolesnikova reportedly detained at Ukrainian border
Why Erdogan won't start a war with Greece over Mediterranean drilling
Kosovo-Serbia talks resume in Brussels after stateside meeting
Why is Karachi drowning and could we have prevented it?How the largest city in Pakistan could have averted a climate crisis.
Tens of thousands take to Belarus streets against Lukashenko
Scores arrested at protest over Hong Kong election delayNearly 100 people were arrested by Hong Kong police on Sunday as riot officers swooped on democracy protesters opposed to the postponement of local elections.
Two French soldiers killed by homemade bomb in northern Mali
Belarusian opposition leader Tsikhanouskaya to meet Polish PM
Erdogan threatens Greece over disputed territorial claims
Extinction Rebellion: Activists charged over printing plant blockadeActivists from Extinction Rebellion blockaded two plants that print Murdoch-owned papers saying they failed "to accurately report on the climate and ecological emergency".
'Grief must be witnessed': A time of national mourning for UK COVID-19 victims is overdue ǀ View
Serbia and Kosovo agree to closer economic ties in US-brokered deal
Is Lithuania playing with fire by slapping sanctions on Belarus?
Trump draws criticism for alleged comments mocking US war deadThe president said a report claiming he called US soldiers killed in action "losers" and "suckers" was a "fake story".
Belarus: Tsikhanouskaya urges UN sanctions against Lukashenko regime
Serbia and Kosovo normalise economic ties after White House talksSerbian President Aleksandar Vucic and Kosovo’s Prime Minister Avdullah Hoti both described the deal, a diplomatic boost for Donald Trump, as a "huge step forward".
Dutch appeals court convicts Geert Wilders of insulting MoroccansA Dutch appeals court on Friday found far-right leader Geert Wilders guilty of insulting Moroccans. It acquitted him of inciting hatred and discrimination.
Europe's week: Vaccine nationalism, poison politics & Charlie HebdoOur bureau in Brussels takes a look at some of the key stories in Europe this week.
The EU Commission was wrong on Phil Hogan’s resignation. The damage may already be done ǀ View
Dutch court stops extraditions to Poland over rule of law concernsThe Dutch court fears that recent changes to Polish law allowing for more disciplinary actions against judges mean "they can no longer be independent of the Polish government".
US election race: Joe Biden meets Jacob Blake's family in Wisconsin
Bulgaria: Borissov 'pouring oil in the fire' over constitution plans
Facebook will ban new political adverts in week before US election
Why did Premier League scrap huge broadcasting deal with Chinese TV?
Belarus crisis: Russia blasts EU for 'illegal unilateral sanctions'
Czech Senate president meets Taiwan leader amid fury from Beijing
Saving Schengen: Germany grapples with COVID crisis border closuresThe coronavirus pandemic has seen many EU countries closing borders, potentially misapplying the rules of the Schengen visa-free travel area. Berlin is proposing new ways of keeping Europe's borders open while assuaging concerns over health and safety.
Finnish ice hockey fans threaten club with boycott over Minsk game
Could Navalny attack be a response to changes in Russian politics?
Businessman Kocner cleared of masterminding Jan Kuciak's murder
Jan Kuciak murder: The crime and trial that shook Slovakia to its core
US government asks states to be ready to distribute vaccines by Nov. 1
Silvio Berlusconi admitted to hospital after positive COVID-19 testEx-Italy PM Silvio Berlusconi has been admitted to hospital "as a precautionary measure" after testing positive for COVID-19, his staff said on Friday.
Watch: Protests continue in Sofia after earlier violenceBiggest demonstrations so far in nearly two months of anti-government rallies
Brexit: UK 'not seeking clean break from EU at all', says Barnier
Turkey's luck turns with the discovery of natural gas
Who is the opposition alliance that won Montenegro's election?
Navalny: Merkel slams 'crime' as Germany confirms Novichok poisoning
A 300-metre long 3D artwork adds beauty to a neighbourhood in Jakarta.A 300-metre long 3D artwork adds beauty and serenity to a neighbourhood in Jakarta. The artists from the independent 'Komunitas Perupa Jakarta' were keen to liven the mood during the ongoing coronavirus pandemic.
Taiwan unveils new passport to emphasise difference with China
Belarus crisis: 'We prevented an attempt at a revolution,' says FM
Voices from the anti-government protests in Bulgaria
Trump visits Kenosha, calls violence 'domestic terrorism'
France 2015 terror attacks: Who are the suspects going on trial?
Students in Belarus skip class to protest against President Lukashenko
Network linked to Russian 'troll factory' removed by Facebook
Charlie Hebdo republishes Muhammad cartoons on eve of terror trial
Charlie Hebdo trial: How the terror attacks unfolded five years ago
Taiwan furore exposes Czech divisions over East-West direction
Why has France's Macron visited Lebanon twice since deadly blast?As French President Emmanuel Macron visits Lebanon for the second time, here's a look back at the history between the two countries.
Montenegro: Thousands take to streets as opposition claims victory
Hong Kong begins mass-testing for virus amid public doubtsMore than 500,000 people in the city of 7.5 million signed up in advance for the program, which will last at least a week.
Lukashenko floats idea of referendum in bid to appease protesters
Former Indian president Pranab Mukherjee dies aged 84Prime Minister Narendra Modi paid tribute to Mukherjee, saying he “left an indelible mark on the development trajectory of our nation”.
Romania's Ludovic Orban avoids censure motion over COVID-19 response
‘Revolting’: Magazine investigated for depicting French MP as a slaveWidely condemned as racist, the “political fiction” published in the right-wing weekly Valeurs Actuelles included images of left-wing politician Danièle Obono with an iron collar around her neck.
Macron calls for reforms as Lebanon names new prime ministerMustapha Adib, Lebanon's ambassador to Germany, was designated Prime Minister.
European cities race to clean the airMounting concerns about public health are pushing cities to scrub their air clean. But just how easy is breathing fresh air again?
Montenegro's ruling party could lose power for first time in 30 years
Belarus cracks down on foreign journalists covering protests
Montenegro is heading the same way as Belarus. Not enough is being done to avoid disaster ǀ View
'Black Panther' star Chadwick Boseman dies of cancer at 43
What is the role of social media in the Belarus protests? | #TheCube
Flavio Briatore: "I was one of the best"The ex‐ Formula 1 multi millionaire businessman talks to Euronews about his successful career and passion for Dubai.
'I won't run in new election' Belarus opposition leader tells Euronews
'Give us a chance': Albanian PM says OSCE must mediate Belarus crisis
Montenegro election: A divided nation chooses between east and west
EU calls on Moscow to refrain from Belarus intervention
Norway’s largest private money manager drops fossil fuel giantsStorebrand says it has dropped companies lobbying against climate policy.
For Belarus, a new chapter has begun - but how will it end?
Europe's week: Brussels politics gears up for busy Autumn
NBA ‘like a political organisation’ claims Trump after players protestDonald Trump has said the NBA has become “like a political organisation" after an unprecedented refusal to play led to the postponement of playoff matches for a second day.
Belarus: Lukashenko ‘afraid of his own people’ claims opposition
Bulgaria: Justice minister resigns as protests pass 50 day mark
How Hogan's resignation presents Von der Leyen with a fresh headache
Mass arrests in Belarus as authorities question Nobel Laureate
'I cannot forget what has happened,' says striking worker in BelarusDespite threats of sackings or prosecutions, some workers in Belarus are determined to go ahead with strikes in protest against the reelection of Alexander Lukashenko. Julia is one such worker and tells Euronews why she's striking.
XXL Bundestag: Opposition slams plan to halt growing German parliament
The EU should learn from its role in Libya’s chaos before getting too involved in Belarus ǀ View
Greece to extend territorial waters amid drilling row with Turkey
Zelenskyy: 'high chance' of ending war in Ukraine 'this year'.In an exclusive interview for Global Conservation with Euronews Correspondent Sasha Vakulina, Ukraine President Vlodoymyr Zelenskyy has said there is a 'high chance' of ending the conflict in the country's east 'this year'
Watch again: Belarusians protest on independence anniversary
'Are you looking for a bloodbath?': Spanish MEP blasts Tsikhanouskaya
'Belarus has woken up': Sviatlana Tsikhanouskaya addresses MEPs
GOP convention: Republicans pitch optimistic future under Trump
TikTok hits back at Trump’s executive order banning app in US
Nobel laureate Alexievich summoned over Belarus opposition council
Golfgate: Commission requests 'further clarifications' from Hogan
Thousands form human chain in Lithuania in solidarity with Belarus
Navalny: Kremlin rejects allegations over suspect poisoning
Republicans due to kick off Donald Trump re-election bid
Lukashenko still has control but many eyes are on Russia, says analystAlex Kokcharov is a Russia and Eastern Europe Analyst at the think-tank IHS Markit.
Watch: Thousands march in Kyiv to mark Ukraine Independence DayThe annual event marks the anniversary of the signing of the Declaration of Independence in 1991.
Donald Trump announces emergency COVID-19 plasma treatment
France reports record COVID-19 infections since May, global cases jump
Belarus: Lukashenko brandishes rifle amid ongoing mass protests
Golfgate: EU trade chief 'sorry' for dinner attendance
'Lies, lies, lies': Belarusian journalists on working for state media
Belarusians prepare for violent protests with first aid training
Belarus: Strongman Lukashenko orders army to defend borders
Here are the most striking images from this week's top storiesHere is our selection of the most striking photographs that made the news this week
Belarus or "White Russia"? What's in a name
Trump asks Supreme Court to let him block Twitter critics
Golfgate scandal: Irish minister resigns after breaking COVID-19 rules
Ceasefire announced in Libya after nine years of political crisis
'Poison is part of Putin's policy,' says Alexei Navalny associateMoscow municipal deputy and associate of Alexei Navalny, Konstantin Jankauskas, tells Euronews he refutes the claim that no poison was found in the opposition politician's blood.
Brexit: 'We are wasting valuable time', says Barnier
Mali junta say change 'has just started' after forcing Keita to resign
Steve Bannon: Trump's former advisor pleads not guilty to fraud charge
Belarus: Tsikhanouskaya urges factory workers to continue strikes
Navalny 'stable' upon arrival in Germany for medical treatment
Kamala Harris with official VP nomination
Misinformation circulates in aftermath of Mali coup
‘He can crawl to the hospital’ — one man’s story of police brutality in Belarus‘He can crawl to the hospital’ — one man’s story of police brutality in Belarus
'They say I sold out to Europe': Belarusian police officer resigns
Poland to give money to "LGBT free" towns denied EU funding
Belarus: Lukashenko threatens renewed crackdown on election protesters
Democrats officially nominate Biden to take on Trump
Army general declares himself in charge of Mali after coup
How are Russian media presenting the unfolding of events in Belarus?
Belarusian ambassador resigns in support of protesters
Hariri verdict: One guilty, three acquitted of murder of former PMFormer Lebanese Prime Minister Rafik Hariri in Beirut was killed in a car bomb in Beirut more than 15 years ago.
Michelle Obama warns Trump is 'in over his head' at DNC
Barcelona mourns the victims of the 2017 terror attacksSixteen people died in the attacks on Las Ramblas and in the coastal town of Cambrils.
In Belarus, a family detained and beaten by police is re-united
Russian support for Lukashenko will only go so far, says analyst
Belarus on general strike in protest against election results
Thousands rally in Minsk as EU prepares emergency summit on Belarus
New Zealand delays election after new virus outbreak
Thousands gather for pro-democracy protest in ThailandAnti-government protesters gathered in Thailand's capital on August 16 for a rally that may test whether their movement has any strength beyond the college campuses where it has blossomed.
Creativity from adversity: Arty face masks inspired by coronaviru
France resumes issuing visas to the Lebanese in act of ‘solidarity’Visa applications had been halted due to the coronavirus pandemic, but France is resuming them following the devastating explosion at the port of Beirut.
French police arrive in Lebanon to investigate Beirut port explosionBoth Lebanese protesters and members of the international community have called for an impartial investigation into the incident that killed more than 170 people and injured thousands.
Belarusians in Poland join protests against President LukashenkoThousands of Belarusians living in Poland joined the protests on Saturday,
some of them waving banners with the slogan "Belarusian Life Matters."
Belarus: Tens of thousands protest as Lukashenko rejects vote rerun
EU to sanction Belarus over electoral 'falsification' and 'violence'
Teenager recounts police beatings while detained amid Belarus protests
Activist recounts her experience of solitary confinement in Belarus
The most striking images from this week's top stories
Beirut Blast: The angry young voices of Lebanon | Culture Clash
Tsarevets Fortress: The City of the Tsars
Women protesters in Belarus: 'We can change country for the better'
'We can't keep silent': Belarus tech CEOs call for new elections
Hungary urges EU to pursue dialogue with Belarus
UAE agrees to normalise ties with IsraelUAE agrees to normalise ties with Israel in bid to halt West Bank annexation
People are seeking change in Belarus. Instead, they’re being mercilessly beaten and detained ǀ View
Across Europe, rallies grow to support Belarus protests
Belarus crackdown: Women form human chains in 'solidarity' protests
Islamic State making a resurgence in western Syria - top US commander
COVID-19 pandemic ruins European class of 2020's first job chances
Doing nothing to help Belarus 'is not an option': Lithuanian FM
Cambodia will no longer benefit from EU's preferential trade programmeFor years, Cambodia and the European Union have been on a collision course over the southeast Asian country's "serious and systemic violation of human rights". Now, its stand has become official.
Bulgaria protesters hunger strike as demonstrations enter second month
Anger and sadness as Beirut marks one week since deadly explosion
US revises UN resolution on Iran to extend arms embargo indefinitely
Row as Belgium beach towns ban day trippers amid heatwave
Belarus: Second protester dies and 6,000 arrested in demonstrations
A week after Lebanon blast, Beirut pauses to remember victims
UK and France 'seek to completely cut' Channel migrant boat routeUK and French immigration ministers held talks in Paris on Tuesday after a recent surge in migrants trying to reach England in small boats.
Belarus opposition Tsikhanouskaya 'independently' fled to LithuaniaThe former English teacher said on Monday that she had made "a decision" to be with her children as she left the Electoral Commission.
How likely are European countries to vote to leave the EU?
Police, protesters clash after Belarus presidential voteTensions had been rising as incumbent President Alexander Lukashenko sought a sixth term despite rising discontent with his authoritarian rule.
Hong Kong media tycoon Jimmy Lai arrested under security law
Protester dies in Belarus as 'explosive detonates in his hand'
Belarus election: Protests break out after disputed presidential vote
International donors say aid to Lebanon should come with reform
Belarus elections: Could mass protests lead to change?
Protesters clash with police in Beirut demonstration
Thousands rally against Putin for fifth Saturday in a rowThe rallies in Khabarovsk, a city on the border with China, is a major show of defiance against Moscow's policies, observers say.
Two Lebanese ministers resign amid protests after deadly Beirut blast
Thousands march in support of arrested governor in Russia's far-east
Owner of cruise ship sunk by Lebanon blast sues 'those responsible'
Ties between Russia and Belarus cool ahead of presidential electionsMoscow says Lukashenko and Putin expressed confidence that the situation will be settled as the arrest of 33 Russians in Belarus threatens to sour ties between the historic allies.
Beirut blast: Distraught families await news of missing relativesRescue teams continue to search for survivors in the rubble of Beirut's port, nearly three days after a massive explosion sent a wave of destruction through Lebanon's capital, killing more than 150 people and wounding thousands.
Minsk's Hi-Tech Park: a symbol of inequality in Lukashenko's BelarusOnce a sign of progress and a success story for President Alexander Lukashenko, the Hi-Tech Park in Minsk has become a symbol of inequality amid a tanking economy.
US imposes sanctions on Hong Kong chief executive Carrie Lam
Denmark's vegan party says it has enough support to run for parliament
Beirut blast: Lebanese president knew about ammonium nitrate stockpile
Beirut blast: How Lebanon is facing crisis after crisis
Beirut: Anger among anti-government protesters rises after blastDiscontent is growing in Beirut after the deadly explosion in the Lebanese capital on Tuesday.
'He's against God": Donald Trump claims Joe Biden wants to 'hurt God'
Who is Belarus' long-time leader Alexander Lukashenko?
New York attorney general seeks to dissolve NRA
'We want to be free': Thousands protest in Belarus for fair election
Twitter to label government officials and state-backed news accounts
UK spends estimated €190m on 50 million face masks it won't use
50,000 sign petition calling for France to take control of Lebanon
Polish MPs don rainbow colours in LGBT stunt at Duda's swearing-in
Macron visits Beirut in aftermath of devastating blastFrench President Emmanuel Macron visited shell-shocked Beirut, pledging support and urging change after a massive explosion devastated the Lebanese capital.
Has COVID-19 struck a fatal blow for Ukraine's green energy drive?Ukraine had one of Europe's most generous renewable energy subsidy schemes as the country strived to increase its use of wind and solar power. But then COVID-19 happened.
There is hope again in Belarus - even as Lukashenko muddies the election waters ǀ View
Bulgarian PM Borissov's offer to step down fails to deter protestersDemonstrators have taken to the streets with the same demands for a month — they want the country's entire cabinet to resign and elections to be held.
How has Belarus changed since 'Europe's last dictator' came to power?
Beirut blast: Macron pledges aid as protests erupt in Lebanon
Nuclear blast in Germany would kill hundreds of thousands: GreenpeaceThe NGO is calling on the US to withdraw nuclear warheads it stores in Germany.
Beirut blast: Macron to visit Lebanon as countries offer help
'People want change': Belarus' rising opposition star on Sunday's vote
Senior Polish MEP under investigation over travel expenses
Belarus: Leader warns of 'harsh sanctions' against opposition protests
Italy's vanishing migrants found abandoned outside the EU
Spain's ex-King Juan Carlos: From democratic hero to tainted exile
Russians hacked into UK minister's emails ahead of election: Report
Spain’s ex-king Juan Carlos quits country amid corruption probe
Alpine Space protects heritage and the environment
Alpine Space: The eco-friendly project which preserves traditionAlpine Space addresses the issues of all groups in the Alps; its mountains, its plains and also its common challenges.
Kosovo PM to self-isolate after saying he tested positive for COVID-19
Poland's presidential election is valid, rules country's top court
Nobel laureate for Work in Northern Ireland, John Hume, dies aged 83
Afghanistan: ISIS attack on Jalalabad prison leaves many casualtiesOfficials said a suicide car bomb exploded and assailants attacked security forces and stormed the prison in Jalalabad, the capital of Nangarhar province.
Italy commemorates Bologna Massacre victims 40 years onItaly commemorates the victims of the Bologna Massacre - the most deadly attack on its soil since the end of the Second World War.
Fourth week of anti-Kremlin protests in Russia's far-east
Once a COVID-19 vaccine is found, what happens next?
Kremlin calls for release of Russians accused of conspiracy in Belarus
Meet the three women teaming up to take on 'Europe's last dictator'
EU's population will plummet by millions more than expected: study
Hong Kong postpones September elections due to coronavirusHong Kong leader Carrie Lam announced on Friday that the government will postpone highly anticipated legislative elections by one year, citing a worsening coronavirus outbreak in the semi-autonomous Chinese city.
Republicans say US election will not be delayed after Trump tweet
Nurses are in the COVID-19 pandemic front lines. They should be first in line for a pay rise ǀ View
Thousands rally in Belarus capital Minsk despite crackdown
COVID-19 mask debate: people from across the globe share their views
European life expectancy increases by 9 months due to less pollutionConsistent efforts to increase air quality over the last 20 years are paying off.
Hong Kong disqualifies 12 opposition candidates from election
Four arrested under new Hong Kong security law for online posts
Top tech CEOs told they have 'too much power' in antitrust hearing
UK signs new deal for 60 million doses of potential COVID-19 vaccine
Prominent opposition figure flees Belarus amid arrest fears
Serbia launches investigation into finances of rights groups
Kosovo asks Apple Maps to show it as an independent nation
Algerians and Moroccans set to lose permission to travel to EU
Is Sweden’s coronavirus strategy working after all?
Former Malaysian PM found guilty in corruption trialNajib Razak was found guilty on Tuesday in a corruption trial over the looting of the 1MDB investment fund.
Brexit talks: A chink of light at the end of the UK-EU trade tunnel?
Violence against women: What is the Istanbul Convention?
New book reveals tensions between Sussexes and senior British royals
Singapore man admits being spy for Chinese intelligence in US
Corruption in Ukraine: Is time running out to reform the country?
Donald Trump backtracks on the full reopening of US schoolsThe US president recognised that in some areas schools may need to reopen a few weeks later.
More than 80 journalists quit Hungarian news site after editor fired
Croatia's parliament approves new government after June election
Sudan unearths mass grave likely linked to foiled 1990 coup
All eyes on the Arctic: US, China and Russia race to control far north
Europe falls behind Asia and Africa for UN climate action goalsMajor efforts are needed to “accelerate progress towards climate mitigation and biodiversity protections”.
'I'm ashamed of our rulers': Bulgarians on why protests are continuing
Facing a surge in cases, French Guiana asks Paris 'where's your help?'The overseas territory is technically equal to any other French department, such as Provence, Calais or Isère. But residents say the health system is not on par with that in the mainland.
MEPs threaten to reject €1.8 tr EU budget & COVID-19 rescue package
QAnon: Twitter bans 7,000 accounts linked to conspiracy theory group
Hungary's Index.hu editor-in-chief has been fired
Hungary claims victory in EU recovery fund talks
German art curator kidnapped in Iraq freed in government operation
COVID-19 vaccine could be ready for Christmas, says UK health minister"We're working really hard on this but I can't promise to play Santa," said UK health minister Matt Hancock, speaking about the possibility of a COVID-19 vaccine by Christmas.
More protests expected after Bulgarian PM survives no-confidence vote
UK 'actively avoided' probing possible Moscow meddling in Brexit vote
Trump and US congress in stand-off over aid as COVID-19 crisis worsens
EU leaders reach landmark €1.82 trillion COVID-19 recovery package
Hong Kongers get creative with protests to skirt new security law
DISARM - predicting fires and protecting against themDISARM is the fire-modelling system giving southern European nations a fighting chance against blazes like the one that caused the Mati tragedy in Greece two years ago.
DISARM - the modelling-system offering protection from fires
How the UNalab Smart Cities project is regreening overheated Eindhoven
UNalab Project pushes climate change readiness for European citiesEindhoven is one of a growing number of European cities using what are called Nature Based Solutions to try to improve urban climate and water resilience. The southern Dutch city is one of several at the forefront of the European UNaLab project.
Do protests in Russia's Far East show Putin's grip is weakening?
Zoltán Kovács: Look who’s talking about the “spread of disinformation” ǀ View
EU marathon summit turning into a ‘fight over sovereignty’
Kanye West launches official presidential bid at unconventional rally
Brexit: COVID-19 leaves UK companies even less prepared, report warns
Why is Bulgaria engulfed in daily anti-government protests?
Russia: Thousands protest against arrest of Khabarovsk region governor
Russia: Huge rallies after arrest of 'people’s governor' Sergei FurgalTens of thousands are protesting in the country's far east after the arrest of Sergei Furgal arrest amid charges of involvement in multiple murders. He got elected governor of the Khabarovsk region in 2018 after defeating the Kremlin-backed incumbent.
John Lewis, lion of civil rights and Congress, dies at 80Tributes have been pouring in for Lewis, the youngest and last survivor of the Big Six civil rights activists, a group led by the Rev. Martin Luther King Jr. that had the greatest impact on the civil rights movement
EU leaders 'far apart' on trillion-euro COVID-19 recovery package deal
Romanian coronavirus patients can't be made to quarantine, court rules
Rule of law to be important part of EU summit talks, says Reynders
This week in the EU: Turkey tensions, Polish elections and vaccines
EU 'back in the driver's seat' as Serbia-Kosovo talks resume
Europe’s cities should take lead on environmental change, says Lyon’s first Green mayorGrégory Doucet was at the head of a green wave in France’s recent local elections, becoming mayor of the country’s third largest city. Now he says like-minded mayors in other countries should join with him to help influence policy in Brussels.
Russia accused of trying to steal COVID-19 vaccine research
Twitter hack: Should I be worried and how can I secure my account?
Going Dutch: Netherlands has 'frugal' approach EU recovery package
Germany denies removing Taiwan's flag from Foreign Ministry website
Bulgaria protests continue despite sacking of three ministers
Donald Trump replaces re-election campaign manager amid tanking polls
Twitter hack: Obama, Biden and Gates accounts targeted in Bitcoin scamThe incursion appears to be centred around a cryptocurrency scam. The tweets, which were fake, offered to send people $2,000 for every $1,000 they sent to a bitcoin address.
Bulgaria protests should make Europe fear 'another Poland or Hungary'
Europe and UAE working towards a sustainable future, says ambassadorEurope has a good relationship with the United Arab Emirates, says Andrea Matteo Fontana, the EU’s Ambassador to the UAE. The next step is creating a future that is more sustainable, where there is more solidarity.
Belarus opens criminal investigation into opposition protests
European Union revamps Europass to get people workingCovid-19 has disproportionately affected young and seasonal workers. The EU has recently revamped Europass, a tool that can help people in their search for work
Europass: Just the job for those seeking work in EuropeThe idea behind the new initiative is to simplify and update the Europass CV and other skills tools for the digital age.
'Mandatory face nappies': Conservatives rage over masks in shops rule
Catalan politician accusing Spain of 'political spying' demands probe
Coronavirus: Man killed by police in US after dispute over face mask
China threatens to impose sanctions after Trump signs Hong Kong order
Serbia set to join US on EU's travel ban list, say sources in Brussels
Bulgaria's anti-government protests keep pressure on PM Boyko Borissov
EU leaders meet ahead of crunch summit to agree on COVID recovery planThe German Chancellor, Angela Merkel, met with Italian premier Guiseppe Conte Monday, ahead of the EU summit on Friday, but said that the positions of the member states remain apart. But she urged her counterparts to consider the bigger picture.
Hossein Dehghani: The collapse of the Iran Nuclear Deal 5 years on would be a failure of EU values
Belarus presidential election: Lukashenko main rival barred from race
Australian governor who fired sitting PM 'given assurances by Queen'Elizabeth II's private secretary told the Governor-General who sparked Australia's biggest constitutional crisis that he could dissolve parliament
Supreme Court clears way for execution of federal prisoner
Banksy painting, stolen from the Bataclan, to be returned to France
Five takeaways from the Polish presidential election
'Dream come true': Italy's gesture 100 years after fascist arsonThe Narodni dom was a state-of-the-art cultural building. Italian fascists burnt it down in 1920 amid tensions between Italy and Yugoslavia.
Thousands join weekend of anti-government protests in eastern Russia
'I believe in justice' says Kosovo's Thaci as he arrives at The Hague
Serbia and Kosovo's leaders agree to meet in person for Brussels talks
COVID-19: Mongolia's traditional Naadam festival goes ahead online
Fifth night of anti-Vučić protests in Belgrade but no trouble reported
COVID-19: Regional elections in Spain go ahead amid increased security
Mueller defends Russia probe after Trump commutes Stone sentenceThe former US special counsel insists that Trump ally Roger Stone 'remains a convicted felon' despite the president's move to stop him from going to jail.
Trump wears mask in public for first time during COVID-19 pandemic
Poland votes: Narrow victory for incumbent Andrzej Duda
Russia: Anti-Putin protests erupt over far east governor's arrestThousands gathered in the city of Khabarovsk and some shouted, "Shame on Moscow!" and "Putin's a thief!" after their governor was arrested.
Srebrenica: World leaders urged to counter Serbian genocide denial
Bulgaria: PM Borissov and government urged to resign by president
Denying and glorifying the Srebrenica genocide is inspiring extremists around the world ǀ View
Singapore's ruling party re-elected as opposition make minor gainsSingapore's long-governing People's Action Party comfortably won Friday's general elections as expected, but faced a setback as the opposition made minor gains.
Donald Trump commutes longtime friend Roger Stone's prison sentence
25 years after Srebrenica, genocide denial is pervasive. It can no longer go unchallenged ǀ View
Serbia protests: Vučić 'not worried' about losing power after unrest
How the Italian mafia is cashing in on COVID-19
Philippine lawmakers vote against renewal of top broadcaster ABS-CBN
It's time to dismantle fast fashion and its exploitative practicesFrankie Leach argues that "there is no redemption for fast fashion" in the wake of the Boohoo slavery scandal.
How the far-right could be kingmaker in Poland's presidential electionYou might think Poland's far-right will flock to support incumbent Andrzej Duda. But it's more complex than that.
Race to be Poland's next president: Who is Rafał Trzaskowski?
Brexit: UK warned of 'thorough' EU border checks from January 2021
Bolivian president has COVID-19 as virus hits Latin America's eliteBolivia’s interim president and Venezuela’s No. 2 leader announced on Thursday that they have been infected with the new coronavirus.
Lithuania follows Latvia in banning Russian broadcaster RTLithuania and Latvia said they would ban RT over the alleged involvement of the EU-sanctioned Dmitry Kiselyov.
LGBT+ civil rights hang in the balance in Poland’s knife-edge presidential election ǀ View
Can France's Green Party recreate their success on the national stage?
Srebrenica: Commemorations to mark 25 years since massacre
'Lessons learned' after Srebrenica massacre, former UN judge says
US Supreme Court rules prosecutors can obtain Trump's tax records
Serbia-Kosovo dispute: What's at stake during Washington talks?
Germany's EU Presidency rejects private sponsors to show 'integrity'
Chechens protest over 'Kremlin-backed' killing of activist in Vienna
Polish presidential poll on a knife edge between Duda & pro-EU hopeful
Controversial sculpture of Melania Trump set alight in Slovenia
Decision day in the race for Eurogroup presidency
Bolsonaro now the 'poster boy' for dubious COVID treatmentBolsonaro now the 'poster boy' for dubious COVID treatment
Ivory Coast PM and presidential candidate Amadou Coulibaly diesCoulibaly, the presidential candidate of Ivory Coast's ruling party, died just days after returning from two months of medical treatment in France.
COVID-19: Harvard, MIT sue US government over foreign students' visas
Ex-journalist denies passing Russian military secrets to NATO countryIvan Safronov, now an adviser to the Russian space agency, faces up to 20 years in prison if convicted of spying
Coronavirus and Brexit talks are putting Scottish independence firmly back on the agenda ǀ View
China doing everything it can to be 'sole superpower' warns FBI chief"China's malign foreign influence campaign targets our policies, our positions, 24/7, 365 days a year," FBI boss Christopher Wray said on Tuesday.
Hong Kong inaugurates Beijing's national security officeit comes just a week after Beijing imposed a tough new law on the city that gives police sweeping powers to conduct searches without warrants and order internet service providers and platforms to remove messages.
Serbian president backtracks on curfew after thousands protest
These revolutionary cities are forcing cars to take a back seatNow could be the perfect time for a sustainable transport revolution.
Moldovan MP 'kidnapped' after defecting from ruling party
Macron's new government: Five things to look out for in France in 2020
Chinese app TikTok to quit Hong Kong amid new security law controversy
Laura Codruta Kövesi: Corruption exists in almost all countries
State-sponsored disinformation in Western democracies is the elephant in the room ǀ View
Kanye West says he will run for US president
Thousands march in Paris to celebrate gay pride and protest violence
'We are ready': Salvini calls for election in anti-government protestThe anti-government rally was joined by League's allies Brothers of Italy and Forza Italia.
Latin America surpasses Europe's number of coronavirus cases
Croatia's ruling conservatives win parliamentary election
Seventeen detained in Moscow at protest for indicted journalistAround 17 people, including journalists, were detained after protesting against criminal charges faced by Russian journalist Svetlana Prokopyeva.
Croatia election: Plenković seeks second mandate in tight race
Why is Macron's new PM from the right when he was tipped to veer left?
As human rights activists know all too well, you speak the truth at your peril in Turkey ǀ View
Khashoggi killing: Turkish court puts Saudi suspects on trial
Macron names Jean Castex as French PM after Edouard Philippe resigns
‘Virus spreading so fast’: Texans told to wear masks after cases soar
Confusion over UK 'air corridor' plans as new quarantine list delayed
Finland's air force phasing out swastika symbol from its logos
New technology and political will can give tourism the post-COVID-19 lift needed to save jobs ǀ View
Watch: The advert banned in France for ‘creating a climate of anxiety’A Dutch electric bike company has had an ad banned for its negative portrayal of the car industry.
Analysis: Six months on, has COVID-19 changed Europe for good?Euronews' political editor Darren McCaffrey looks back at how COVID-19, six months since it emerged, has affected Europe.
Spain and Portugal warn of new COVID-19 outbreaks as border reopens
Ukraine's central bank chief quits over 'political pressure'
Belarus presidential hopeful barred as Lukashenko election rivals cut
Russia voters agree to let Putin extend power until 2036
Merkel’s EU presidency is a critical test for EU solidarity ǀ View
Hong Kong: 'Hundreds' held amid protests as new security law enforced
Ex-health minister Buzyn defends France's early coronavirus responseAgnès Buzyn was health minister in France until mid-February and faced criticism over the government's coronavirus response.
